Some of us are scared stiff to think there is a devil under every stone, which is also the reason for all the world’s ills, they think.
- Grilled Salmon with a marinade. Salt and pepper the salmon fillets modestly on both sides. Prepare marinade. (I don’t measure anything – I taste it to ensure the balance of sweet and spice). I use a mix of a tbsp honey, tbs EVOO, tsp balsamic, dash Worcestershire, tsp teriyaki, tsp peanut/almond butter, 1/2 tsp cayenne, salt & pepper. Taste! If it needs heat, add more cayenne. If more sweet, use honey or almond butter. Use half of mix on salmon and marinate for 10-15 minutes in fridge.
Every so often, Declan will post an 'advertisement' for one of his books. That's great. It's only his blog, like, but he's subtly excusing his own intrusion onto it. But take today as a snapshot. I scroll down his blog and he's got a post about Stuart Neville, then Lee Child, then his own Irish Book Award nominated novel Absolute Zero Cool, an interview with some tube and a post about Colin Bateman's excellent Starkey series. Five posts in five days and only one of them about his own novel. Me? Bar a great interview with Nigel Bird (who isn't one wee bit Irish, BTW), my last five posts have been all about The Point and I haven't even posted those daily.
I can’t help thinking that this is another case of shooting the wrong messenger. I contend that we don’t have an alcohol problem as such – we have a dickhead problem. We have a problem with not enough parents prepared to show a good example to their kids nor to pull them into line when they stray from the guidelines of behaviour in a civilised society.
Right now I'm celebrating MLK day by watching the ice freeze on my deck and hoping to catch up.
well hello, i've come up from the ashes. the ashes of the blog.
Many of the preist-warriors are against the truce, either because they sincerely believe the Fianna are evil, or because they can't bear to accept that they have been killing innocents all these years. (It's hinted that there are similar misgivings on the other side of the cease-fire, but we haven't yet seen much of the Fianna other than Liam in the first 50 pages.) The priest "Inquisitor" doing the testing on Liam -- with an armed guard always at hand -- repeatedly refers to Liam as "it," unwilling to regard him as a person with a soul.
% grep -i science science.txt
You are giving up the old paradigm and fully reconciling with spirituality only when you establish science on the basis of the fundamental spiritual notion that consciousness is the ground of all being. That is what I have done in my book, and that is the beginning. But already there are some other books that are recognizing this too.
Des replies matter of fact, "Of course...You're John Locke."
***NOTE*** I have now released a documentary about this subject, which goes into specific detail regarding this article and the corporate structure of the United States. You may view it for free at: http://thecorporationnation.com/
The Follower’s Advantage
God Bless those we have lost.
“Yeah, I’ll go. You can count on me.”
was raped by a local
I am pushing ahead, as always. I am going to find ways to cope. I am going to add another post. I am going to get where I am going. And I will always, always, always, do everything I can for my children. They are my heart and soul.
R - Time and tide wait for no man.
Furthering the controversy, the competition was overseen by New Zealand supermodel Rachel Hunter and other non-Fijian judges.
Car headlights snapped her out of her thoughts. A white Audi sports car purred past her, rear lights flashing bright crimson in the darkness as it stopped at the junction ahead and then turned and roared away.
Friday, 5/18: Fend night
If you could see what I can see
Are we everywhere?
Cheers to being young and stupid.
12. Do any foods remind you of someone?
O’Conner continues:
Our first 2011 club meeting will be Tuesday January 11 at 8pm at the Coney. Starting this month, we'll be getting back into more topical discussions at the start of the meeting before we start any homebrew tastings.
He will always, always con people wearing glasses with the most loving of actions. They pick him up, he gives them a snuggle...then he rips their glasses off their face and tosses them. He did that when he first came home....still does it now.
It is friday!! I am so excited!!
Ara Burklund has been kind enough to provide us with a great synopsis of the intensive given by the talented author and editor Deborah Halverson. The recap is information-packed, but Deborah is an engaging speaker, and her session was so good you'll want to hear her for yourself if you have the opportunity.
Alas, even the miserable black and white pictures are misleading and full of prejudice. Think on it TES, and think again.'
I'm a serious lover of all things mouse related!
I took another dose of painkillers and resigned myself to attending hospital. Kerri had warned me that if I had a break there and I toughed it out, then I'd likely have pain and arthritis for the rest of my life. One thing about having a doctor in the family, we might hide splinters and minor injuries from her, but if it's serious, we listen carefully.
and whirls around them
1/2 c milk
It follows comments made about a Dispatches programme, Undercover Mosque, which tackled claims of Islamic extremism in the West Midlands.
How about taking a sip & taking in the aroma first? You fell into the awful trap of drinking with your eyes! Why? Because you are vain, your car shines, you have 20-20 vision, your windows have just been cleaned & you have HD TV! Bad practice sunshine, stop, stop right there & have a word with yourself!
Well this is interesting and something I don't think about. Our learning spaces are not separated from our living spaces due to the idea that learning is a lifestyle not an educational choice. Our spaces are varied
One of my favorite parts of the interview is at the very end when Dr. Carson is asked why when he was asked to speak at a Presidential Prayer Breakfast in 1997 but told not to mention Jesus, he did anyway, and when he spoke at Columbine High school after the shootings he was asked not to mention God, he did anyway, and he answers by saying, "I can not separate who I am am from what I believe." He then goes on to say that when Hollywood was making the movie about his life,
Peace. Love. & Cupcakes.
The other claim, of course, is that immigrants bring skills which the locals don't have. This is an even more dubious claim and often quite a dangerous one, particularly when it comes to the health service, where political correctness requires that we pretend to treat medical qualifications obtained in Kampala or Islamabad as if they are worth more than a diploma in woodwork. Meanwhile the government save money by not having to train our own doctors, as its ministers quietly pay their BUPA subscription, and pray they never get treated by a doctor who qualified in Kampala.
As the person that chose to stay home, you get none of that. Not even the recognition. In fact, you get told that its whats expected of you so what are you complaining about.
kind of moment.
The Friday afternoon we left for Coral Springs, I got a later start than I wanted to. I left Miss K's medicine at home and it was of utmost importance that I made the trip back home to get it. So we were an hour behind schedule which put the other mom getting there before us. She texted me when she arrived and said they would just wait in the lobby. Fifteen minutes later she texts me "we checked in and we're in the room". I was like WTH? I had to control my anger at that very moment. If she had been any real friend of mine, I would have been fine with that. But to just go ahead and take it upon herself to do that, really set the tone for the weekend.
He concluded simply, “We will be back. Re-group for tomorrow.”
I recently read an article that said most Americans believe that marriage is becoming obsolete. Really? Is that what we have become? I have been married for almost 20 years to the same wonderful man that one day I will grow old with and join into our Heavenly Fathers kingdom with. This is the same man who has fathered my 3 sons, stood by me through thick and thin. Seen me at my best and at my worst. Followed me up and down the path of mood swings, migraines and all sorts of other goodies.
1 cup small Macaroni Noodles
Bush Radio in partnership with Vodacom will be bringing you the very best of SA entertainment at the Vodacom Community Comedy Festival on Sunday the 10th July 2011 at the Joseph Stone Auditorium in Athlone from 4pm-6pm.
Victorine Mary Sharp (1862-1945), sister to Milo Riley Sharp.
Photo 2 = The chain from the locket on the Blood Chronicles page
I used dry lotus seeds as this was all I could find.
Sent: Friday, December 05, 2008 3:25 PM
The challenges for this one are
That you believe in Allah and His Messenger (Muhammad pbuh) and that you strive hard and fight in the Cause of Allah (swt) with your wealth and your lives... (V.61:11 )
2:35: BT-Dub, he used BT-Dub! Bingo! Bingo! I’ve completed a row in D-Bag Bingo! BT-Dub finishes my row of sideways visor, wife-beater t-shirt, random push-ups, and owning the CD of Creed’s Greatest Hits. Bingo! I win!
You may think (and I hope you do, a mind is a terrible thing to waste) that I am writing this because I want to save someone… maybe even you… from the same dismal fate I have brought upon myself. The sad truth is that I am really motivated more by that elusive pizza. Music just doesn’t seem to hack it. So DON’T give this book to your friend. Be stingy. Let him buy his own copy. Tell him I’ll autograph the copy… just like I did my mother’s copy and the one that other fellow bought.
Related Artists:::
the snowy driveway
Oh, and there is another scare tactic being used: The ration of workers to retirees. Over the next decades, the number of workers compared to the number of retirees is predicted to shrink - that is, there will be fewer workers to support retirees. That, we're told in the darkest tones possible, will bring an intolerable burden on "ordinary wage earners" and thus the economy.
0215-0245 - Vandaveer
I have read descriptions of the program which compared what happened to a show trial, bear baiting and a kangaroo court, all of which are fair comment. To some degree it was expected, one commentator at my blog last week, on hearing that Nick Griffin was to appear on Question Time said “they will be around him like piranha” and they were. However, I doubt many expected the BBC to actually go so far as to change the format of its flagship political program, established over three decades, for the soul purpose of disadvantaging one guest. Indeed they went much further than that, the BBC set out to pillory and humiliate Nick Griffin, and may well have unintentionally gained him a lot of sympathy in the process.
the little blue and white condo on the corner with the wrap around porch full of kid toys
I’ve seen some of the projects being made and a few of the proof pages – it’s going to be a great book.
Rimmel Lasting Finish Lipstick in Dreamy
There was such a crowd and so many people waiting in line to speak that I decided not to get in line and so said nothing. If I had spoken I would have pointed out to the Councilors that I own over 50,000 posters, street sheets and other materials documenting the culture of Western Massachusetts over the last quarter century. I have always wanted to give this priceless historical collection to the Quadrangle, having had a friendship with the Quad going back to my childhood acquaintances with Margaret Rose and Dorothy Mozley.
United Nation on ‘culture’ – According to United Nation, a culture is a set of values, attitudes, language and ways of life. Whenever layers of culture and civilization are overshadowed, man’s real nature with all its animal instinct is exposed. Everything works well, when people are humane and familiar with the basics of their culture.
The other part of the bottom shelf really feels kinda like that hodge podge table at a wedding. No one really has anything to do with one another, but you had no where else to put them. These are mostly just our food in tubs or jars, sides and toppings.
Denmark’s drafts are showcased in Copenhagen. America dedicates a full week to craft beer, and big beer fests in Prague, Louisiana and Cleveland. 6 Big Beer Festivals in May 2012.
The day was warm, and winds were prosy;
From day 1 we put up a cheap website from Yahoo, then after three months we were on our third generation website which looked a little more professional. One of the biggest misconceptions is that you have to have a perfect website before you launch your company. So if you were not a coder, which I am not, you would have had to go find a developer and pay them thousands of dollars to create a site that may not go anywhere. So I suggest utilizing all of the platforms wordpress, etc, available today. It is easy to put together a good looking site which you can launch within 2 hrs. of coming up with the idea. This is what is so great about modern technology. Be prepared to wear multiple hats. At eRollover, I was a blogger, cold caller, tried learning PHP, Java, and Joomla just to try to give direction to part-time developers. I made lunch runs for the team, setup and worked booths at trade shows, begged and graveled for capital from angel investors and the list goes on. As an entrepreneur you have to be willing to do what it takes to prove your business. Back to my story, by the third month we were generating around $5,000 a month and to me we had proven the model. I will talk more about the capital raising process and how to recruit management in another post. Today we have been able to turn FiPath into a great social platform-helping consumer to make the best decision about their retirement.
Being a Generation Xer who came of age in the 80's, the first truly scary vampire I remember seeing on film (or, in this case, on TV), was Mr. Barlow, "the Master" in Tobe Hooper's 1979 mini-series adaptation of Stephen King's 'Salem's Lot. That sonofabitch is SCARY looking, and when he first popped up in that jail cell sequence, he scared the crap out of me.
A Northland farming leader has taken out an ad in his local paper claiming the Kaipara District Council is bankrupt and the council should resign. The operations director of Farmers of New Zealand, Bill Guest, says the small council is now nearly $90 million in debt.
9 Well, I'm just not sure if I'm really ready to have editors see this. I'm still working on it. I'll get back to you.
Today I'd like to talk about Black hair.
Make it easier to find that special piece to complement your outfit! Here are some tips to organize your jewelry:
So a parent has to be a "Level 5" leader . . . to earn the privilege of connecting with their children by coaching, and loving, and respecting, and believing, and inspiring, and motivating . . . but with a humility and grace that inspires confidence and trust, and earns credibility with their partner and their children. They have to recognize the fault in their expectation that a child should listen to and respect the parent because they are a parent, instead of because of what kind of parent they are. They must recognize and embody what every good leaders knows instinctively - that trust and credibility with your children must be earned, in every action and word.
~Proverbs 22:6
Later, he would get a job with Utusan Zaman in Singapore and other well-known Malay language magazines like Mastika and Remaja. He added that the reason why he wanted to write to much was so that he could chronicle everything he saw as sincerely as possible as seen through his eyes.
In all, three different programs were used in combinations that required the volunteers to complete sets of as many repetitions as possible with their assigned loads — typically eight to 12 times per set at the heaviest weights and 25-30 times at the lowest weights.
Et moi? This weekend, I will iron my table linens. After Thanksgiving, I laundered my linens; now they are soft and sweet smelling, and ready to be ironed in preparation for Christmas.
Rachel Taylor of Simply Social Chicago led the more advanced workshop, “Social Media 201: Sharpening My Skills.” Rachel delved into topics like creating a content calendar, using Facebook ads and more.
When she called me with the news on Monday that John (her husband) had been seriously injured in a car accident I did what any sister would do. I worried. I prayed. And I worried more.
*Note, I add this two herbs if I am using Factory pre packed BKT spices.
The cover and info on this week's edition of Doctor Who Adventures magazine:
3 viable
Do you know of anywhere to visit, because maybe MP's souvenir is an art print from Paris. We're NOT talking anything like Picasso or even the minor Surrealist artists; we're talking prints that are more affordable and that can wake up the imagination. The truth is that MP has a very artistic bent and loves the visual arts. His souvenirs from Russia are street art, and he hangs up art pieces picked up from friends and travel throughout our home. He could discover something similarly emotive in Paris (do not even suggest the stands at Sacré Coeur or I will muffle you--big grin)--and I want as many opportunities as possible for this to happen.
Cat Adams
A mother who conned a former lover into thinking he was the father of her daughter for more than 13 years has been jailed.
True pricing would drastically alter our energy use for the better, and greatly aid the environment, and greatly improve the lives of our children through direct health effects.
Went to see Doug Benson last Friday night:
She inserted it into the former lieutenant’s open-vested pocket.
that sounded like peach brandy and oars
Percy William Gibbs (1895-1925) was a landscape painter, residing in East Molesey, Surrey. Just around the corner from where I live. He regularly exhibited at the Royal Academy from 1894 to 1937. The painting above, 'A Summer's Day', is available for viewing and for sale at John Noott Galleries in Worcestershire. More information on this painting is available here.
I got it bad. My legs are restless, my thoughts shift from panic to peace, then to frustration. I hear Thunder.
All that concrete and glass. All that electricity needed to keep in cool in summer and warm in winter. All those staff relocation costs when they moved from Reading to Exeter.
It’s finally time for me to get serious about improving my health. And weight loss is the first step. I’ve been a yo-yo’er most of my life. I started out a skinny kid but emotional eating set in by the time I was 6 years old. I can remember doing workout videos and trying to lose weight on my own when I was as young as 11. I don’t want my children to ever go through that and I figure the best way to start is to get my self into shape as a role model before I have them. I’ve been married for 5 months to a thin, athletic husband and I can’t imagine a better time for me to start. Other than about a decade ago, of course.
HENRY JAGLOM: Cause she was gonna leave me, I loved her, and I didn't wanna let her go. She was a few years younger, she had came to me from her parent's house. She thought there was more out in the world for her. I told her there was nothing out there, and it would take her a few years to realize it. She didn't have enough life experience, and I didn't want her to break my heart. So I thought that by making the film, it would make her realize how wonderful we had been together. I thought we'd get back together, but it just didn't work out that way.
FYI: My computer is giving me fits and has been SLOW to visit some bloggers and if I do visit its even slower to leave a comment so I give up...I'm calling in the computer guy next week!
Here is a photo of the last page. The last archetype I did was the mask. The idea behind the mask is that it's the face that we present to the world. Not that it is a false face, just the face that world knows. The implication is that we are more than what the world sees. Here is mine.
tasyaite kathitā hy arthāḥ
Hope for this earth, this nature that we destroy daily, each of us, me included; we all scratch away and use it without the proper thanks (although we try, and are getting better).
He glares at me, "It was just a kiss Kate, didn't know it was going to turn you into a total bitch."
They put the phone down on me
Take it to the altar of sacrifice
9. Profanation
burnished river stone—
My Creative Future is for anyone who wants to be part of the creative world and in particular, a majority of the posts will be aimed at 14-25 year olds: anyone still in school and choosing their GCSEs, year 11 students who are starting to think about their post 16 education routes, College students thinking about work or choosing a university to go to.
Choose your delusion.
Thank you all for your patience. I will be doing my best to get back my blogging mojo….and have fun things starting in the new year. 2011 is going to be MY year. I can feel it. Do you have anything planned for 2011? Tell me…maybe we can inspire each other.
They even have a quasi tutorial on fitting.
Here are a couple questions to help you consider the WHERE for the WHO (your participants) of your event:
Horizontal Calf Raise: 20 @ 30 lbs
“We have deputed a team of experts to conduct an inquiry to ascertain the reasons behind the unnatural death of fishes,” Deputy Chief Minister B M Lanong said. While the report is expected to be submitted within this week, the DyCM who is also in charge of Mining and Geology did not rule out the possibility of exploratory drilling for uranium in upstream areas of the river. Government scientists also feared that the fish were poisoned either by miscreants throwing poison in the river or unscientific mining.
Last week at the Moscow gathering for the International Advertising Association(IAA), he emphasised that the ‘Hopenhagen’ campaign, which he is primarily attributed as prompting, showed the capacity for advertisers to promote critical global issues.
Remember, too that your pet is not the only one in the back, someone might be trying to restrain a cat that is about to explode, a doctor may be performing a minor surgery, or another client may be receiving tragic news, so you being allowed in the back, as part of the larger picture would be anything but helpful.
I have a Clematis fargesoides 'Summer Snow' (although I think it goes by another name now) that is a big thug, and could be cut back hard (that is, to the base) every year, if I wanted to.
The first nails are Nailtini color in Stinger, a gorgeous duochrome that goes from teal to purple in the light. With an Inglot Flakie on top. Love this look! I am sporting it right now!
...sunny but chilly...
Another brush with death
In this life, every rock you throw into the pool of life creates a ripple. Some are good and some are bad. When you send off a nasty old ripple it bounces off others and what ends up coming back to you? Karma baby, you know what that is.....
Lastly, in case you were wondering...my birthday is in 11 days! :D
Because the Lord is great and worthy of praise,
Average bosses buy into the notion that work is, at best, a necessary evil. They fully expect employees to resent having to work, and therefore tend to subconsciously define themselves as oppressors and their employees as victims. Everyone then behaves accordingly.
1 advancement
Road block oh life penalty
Cats will overeat and cry for food even when they aren't actually hungry. So it is up to the humans to make sure they get what is best for them.
I used a really old SU set and DP. The button was made by layering punches, glueing between the layers, and poking holes with a piercer. Crystal Effects makes the button shiny. The only hard part is waiting for it to dry (and I'm really impatient!). I added a ribbon, a nestie and some corner die cuts, and a couple of yellow pearls. Oh yes, and some crystal effects to the vase.
That Hope and Innocence, feel Rebirth in Your Bond.
hope that we are actually normal.
Spicy Tartar Sauce:
Takoma Park Elementary School is in the middle of the neighborhood, the ideal location for kids to walk and bicycle to school. As we know, when kids walk or bicycle to school, they arrive at school ready to learn and focus and gain physical activity important for health. Plus, with the reduced car traffic, air quality is better around schools and stress is alleviated for all by avoiding congested drop-off and pick-up lines.
The sacs, priced at 22 Euros, come in gold, silver or black.
The Java approach that I planned to take was to write a parser that would load the file into memory, traverse the files entries in the zip, unzip the ones of interest into memory and then process them. The files of interest to meet the goal above are the sheets and the shared strings. As the sheets are parsed, I would add them to a worksheet object. As rows are parsed they would be added to their respective sheet, and cells would be added to their respective rows. The shared strings would be parsed into a lookup table that would be available to the cells.
Not an antiquated word, you say? Pishery-pashery! The word was in use LONG before computers pilfered the term.
Your top is done. Do a little sewing room dance! Cut your backing and batting to match. Now you need to assemble the entire rug. Lay your batting piece down, top it with your finished top piece (very important- top needs to right side up), then place your backing piece right side down (very important). Pin all around the edges. See photo. When you sew, leave a 3-4 inch hole on the center of the blue edge for turning right side out. Stitch a quarter inch seam around, clip corners for a better result (be sure not to clip the seams), turn it right side out, pin hole shut, top stitch around the entire square. I added three lines of "quilting" to add a bit of security to the batting, but you may quilt as desired.
hello!
as it is.....
Ten years later, in 2007, the China Investment Corporation (CIC), a sovereign wealth fund, came into being. CIC was allocated $200 billion, out of China’s hard earned foreign exchange reserves. Its mission was to make “long term investments that maximise risk adjusted financial returns for the benefit of its shareholders.” The underlying objective was to put China’s growing foreign exchange reserves to good use. Within four years, CIC assets had doubled to $400 billion, which was a clear proof of pragmatic management and optimal use of funds in a world market plagued by a financial crisis that had brought down many champions of unbridled capitalism to their knees.
Anyway my resolve has been sorely tested of late. My favourite Mary Jane black work shoes are looking a little tired and my trusty long black cardigan (which looks fabulously corporate when I need it or casual when I don't) has developed holes. The horror.
In 2008, DeChristopher protested land sold by the Bureau of Land Management (BLM) by bidding on 14 parcels of land in Salt Lake City. After being arrested and put on trial, DeChristopher was sentenced to two years in federal prison, where he is currently. Gibb was in attendance of a protest following the sentencing and indicated his support for DeChristopher.
Who cares? Well…
Oooh--breaking news: The third test is over, and once again, Sam has passed. Two out of three ain't bad, little man, especially considering how many changes you've been through today.
The opportunities this month:
And water 350
If you could do anything, have anything in your life, right now, what would that be? Whenever you are right now, both figuratively and literally, is it where you want to be? Other thoughts?
Will we get a vinyl version with any limited nick–nacks?
Damn with faint praise, assent with civil leer,
Unfortunately these were issues of health in our house.
Helped to avoid the need for just-in-time support.
I am officially a graduate of Belmont University with a degree in Classical Voice Performance (woot!), and now I actually have TIME to have a life.
If I do this, I will be the 3rd of my blogger bitches who's had to do this recently because they've been "found out." This sucks. I mean, it really, really does.
130Plants of thy hand, and children of thy pray'r.
There's so much more to Fracture than Delaney's recovery from her near death experience; we learn about her family and their history, her friends (and frenemies, naturally) and Decker, her best friend and neighbour. Let me just get this out of my system - I bloody love Decker. I tend not to get too many literary crushes from supernatural novels, as I find most of the heroes to be completely one-dimensional but Decker is an awesome, awesome character. I love that he's flawed and a little unconfident, unsure of anything except for his solid friendship with Delaney. Love him.
prescence in a polite fog", Vermorel observed. A few of my more
Postscript
Q: What would you do if your husband ever left you? How would you make money?
Had a go tonight and this is my first attempt.
Since that first serial I’ve been lucky enough to have had twenty-one serials
Handing a bible to vicious foreign assailants who attack and intimidate you in your home or securing funding for liars and cheats attempting to bring foreign religions into the area, or holding a candlelit mass to hope that people will be nice will not prevent crime.
12. San Diego Model Railroad Museum
The Bill also makes an unneccesary distinction between procedural and substantive unfair contract terms. It fails to make provision as to what types of contracts exactly are covered by the Part and extending the application to “all” contracts could possibly have unexpected and unfavourable ramifications. It crucially also fails to address the issue of application taking into account where the contract is concluded (ie whether in or outside Malaysia) or what happens when a contract applies foreign law. A test for determining what amounts to “without adaquate justifiaction” is absent, as well as a list of examples of unfair contract terms. What offence created is not clearly defined and the potential effects not carefully studied.
The point that matters here is the review’s denunciation of one of the central points of the book, which is that those who want to change the world need to start by changing their own lives. According to Lloyd, we don’t have time for that, since the biosphere is in dire peril; what’s needed instead are the standard tools of contemporary activism—"direct action, community building, and outreach," in his convenient summary. His reasoning is logical enough, as far as it goes; if your house is on fire, after all, it’s a little late to install sprinklers and smoke alarms. If the situation is as urgent as Lloyd claims, all other considerations have to take a back seat to an all-out effort to deal with the immediate crisis with the most effective means available.
So far, so insulting. He then went on to say:
Friday: Walked at the park.
30. Death Proof
Because I’m a pessimist, I’ll start with the cons. Here goes:
those who plan to take time off during the Games because they hope to be:
Horrible drunk male voices belted out in unison the chorus to “Don’t Look Back In Anger.” A friend chided a younger fan for his “Justin Bieber hair.” (We rebuked our buddy and told him the kid had a Beatles cut, a good thing, not a bad one.) Why Oasis and Noel Gallagher fans do this I’ll never quite understand, but there were a couple of people around wearing Manchester United gear and there was a shout or two of “Glory, glory Man United!” to be heard. Heads up: Noel hates Man United. He’s a City fan. But I digress…
Okay, so I know I haven't gotten too personal here...I guess it's my way of staying semi private but I want to be real with you all! I want you to know my secrets, my struggles, my strengths, everythinggg!
5. I'm terrified of doctors and dentists and will make myself sick thinking about an upcoming appointment.
Saurel-Cubizolles MJ, Kaminski M, du Mazaubrun C, Llada J, Estryn-Behar M. High blood pressure during pregnancy and working conditions among hospital personnel. Eur J Obstet Gynecol Reprod Biol 1991; 40: 29-34.
Lesson: The spiral links all the pages together.
O'Brien & Gere Limited had the largest lobbying contract, valued at $1,547,812. The firm lobbies on its own behalf. Forest City Ratner Companies, a commercial real estate company, had the second largest contract with Fried Frank Harris Shriver & Jacobson, LLP, valued at $771,170.
By now, there is "a growing tension on the farm", and Albert is getting in more and more arguments with his mother and father. The mother insists that his father only drinks so much because he worries about the farm mortgage, and because he's getting older. "Albert and his father scarcely spoke to each other on those days," narrates Joey, "and Albert's mother was used more and more by both as a go-between, as a negotiator."
Dale had tried beating one to death with the thick end of his cane, but only wound up cowering on the floor while his wife shoved a coat hanger through its eye, dropping it instantly.
There is nothing more that I can say to tell you about her except to simply share her eulogy.
Stop all the clocks, cut off the telephone,
A little goes a long way.
That sounded reasonable, but what could I ask? Sonya's last name? No, it had to be something I already knew the answer to, just in case Madame Imelda answered falsely. It was Sonya's baby daughter that brought me here in the first place. I could ask something along those lines. The daughter's name, maybe? No, I didn't know that either. Wait, I could just ask the psychic if she even knew Sonya had a baby daughter.
She couldn’t help the moan that escaped her lips as he gently pushed the dress over her breasts and arms until the fabric reached her wrists. She held her arms still, although the thought of moving them so he’d follow through on his threat to spank her sent waves of desire straight to her pussy.
Rice (all)
Then I’ll jump on him with my angry passion
After dinner we unloaded the car and the kids started to load up their backpacks with their new goodies. But Bug had left his new backpack in the car, so he headed out there to grab it.
Now the Port Authority and the U.S. Department of Transportation Federal High Administration (USDOT) is reopening ideas to improve the movement of goods around New York Harbor—specifically how goods move east of the Hudson River to the west and vice versa.
What might you do to encourage someone today?
· Marian Goodell, co-owner and producer, Burning Man
“Vickie, you need to go take your shower. It’s almost time to leave.”
made a shame that I might inherit glory,
like we did when spring began
1. Economic Interest
And if you buy my beer and ale
You don’t have to have a blog to play along with the sketch challenge. If you upload your project to any on-line galleries or forums, please use the keyword of WMSC93. As always you are welcome and encouraged to upload your project to your album in the Waltzingmouse Stamps Gallery!
Feeling sorry for myself? Yes.
As we do, our troops will be coming home. Last year, we removed 10,000 U.S. troops from Afghanistan. Another 23,000 will leave by the end of the summer. After that, reductions will continue at a steady pace, with more and more of our troops coming home. And as our coalition agreed, by the end of 2014 the Afghans will be fully responsible for the security of their country.
Okay, I said I wouldn't make this blog into a constant drone about our upcoming departure. But after spending three days inside this week while the movers did their thing, it's very much on my mind. Fortunately, now that we're over the hump, there's time to get out there and experience Paris. So stay tuned. Until then, I give you this time series.
Now the smile leaks out, but he manages to make it more compassionate than mirthful. “I’ll put it in my planner,” Devoy assures her, and the old woman relaxes her hold on his wrist. “Until then, is there anything I can get you?”
Use a timezone converter online to figure out what day and time you need to available on.
...or The Ghost Writer (2010). Roman Polanski's latest film (an adaptation of a novel by Robert Harris) provides the most interesting of these three cases regarding personal versus impersonal films: Is it merely a light thriller, or does that lightness mask something deeper?
Huizenga's work in the 2000s hasn't been limited to Ganges, by any means. He's been a prolific and diverse artist, also publishing five issues of the minicomic Or Else, which combined reprints of material from his previous Supermonster series with new stories. He also put together the book collection Curses, which gathered together Or Else #1 with various anthology appearances and short stories. Huizenga's work is best appreciated as a complete oeuvre, as his signature fascinations — the mind, nature, religion, domesticity, memory, philosophy, science — are treated in different ways and different aesthetic forms throughout his work. Glenn Ganges, the blank-faced, big-nosed cartoon who wanders through many of these stories, is Huizenga's neutral observer, his way of getting a handle on all the ideas and moments he wants to explore. His work, no matter where it is encountered, is refreshing, sophisticated and exciting. [buy] | [buy]
I'd love to be able to send you to a website full of Prada's latest guipure and gem bombers and swirling car print skirts. Alas, none are to be had on the Internet. However, the Prada site does provide us with jewels, shoes and bags galore...
“The Ghost Canal” might also prove interesting for folks visiting the Newmarket-Holland Landing area, where the evidence of this canal is still quite visible. It would be a great way to get the kids interested in history, and Ontario history in particular.
I still have my deadlines and colleagues. We set up a writing group after the course, and we meet in the library opposite City University. It’s great to work with all these talented people, to feel that we can contribute to each other’s work. It’s bridged the gap for me between the teamwork and immediacy of journalism and the solitude of novel-writing.
Regroup.
i also found some beautiful antique sheet music that i'll be using to make cones for the petal-tossing ... has anyone seen a step-by-step to make the cones? i thought it would be really simple but maybe the paper just isn't the right size? any ideas?
Amagami SS+: 76
BLOEMFONTEIN, South Africa (Reuters) - Jaque Fourie scored a late try as South Africa opened their Tri-Nations campaign with a 28-19 victory over holders New Zealand in Bloemfontein on Saturday.
What matters is following through with their proposal and essentially, winning their argument.
Her nursery is done (though a room is truly never "done", am I right?) & I'm learning how to use our new fancy camera whilst waiting for this Colorado snow storm to pass so I can take decent pics of the room. Hope to be able to share her nursery with you all next week..........unless the little lady decides to make her debut, of course. Thanks for your patience!
Finally, it's about comfort. I want my kids to be themselves around me. If a "colorful metaphor" will help them do that, I have no problem with that.
Kids have this ability to be so resilient when as adults we worry ourselves into the ground. I happened upon the following entry that my daughter wrote in her blog. I have to share it with you because it brought a huge smile to my face during an extremely stressful time and put what is really important into perspective. My family.
Hedwig, a dearly loved friend,
Nostalgic memories, for me, don't precede the 1960's. Since I was born in 1961 (yes, I turned the big 5-0 this year!), my growing-up years were the 60's and 70's. So, while many of y'all have nostalgic memories from the 30's, 40's, and 50's, I don't. Oh, I love those time periods (especially the 40's) and enjoy reading about them, but the memories I have won't be from then. Instead, I can share boundless memories from times a bit more current, mostly the mid-to-late 60's and the early-to-mid 70's. Those are the days that are the "good old days" for me.
seat also docks and rotates on Rocker
I loved reading this. I loved reading it a lot. You've got suspense. Action. Zombies. ROMANCE. What else do you need? Dig right in!
Maharajah's Burra-Peg (as adapted)
Félix Simtaine - drums
In two months time, I’ll be giving my first Vancouver workshop in years. Urbanthinkers’ Adult Facilitator in Youth Engagement workshop will be offered as a Velo-city Global 2012 Vancouver pre-conference workshop on Mon. Jun. 25th from 9:00am to 3:30pm. This workshop has been delivered across Canada, and in seven cities in the USA, Australia and New Zealand.
Pockets. There is a two-sided "kraft" pocket at the front of the notebook. Like the cover and binding, quite sturdy. A nice touch for such an inexpensive product.
What actually struck me as being more odd than a midget western, was that most of the actors had heavy German accents.
My world is on pause
From the 'War to end all wars'.
5) Yanjing - 'The National Ale of China'
It was Friday night, and we’d decided to chill out with a movie and something to eat. Little did I know that “The Fly” (good choice of pre-labour entertainment, eh?) and veggy lasagna would come just a few hours before my son decided to make his debut.
I received my gift from Santa Claus (S.C.) which consisted of a handmade friendship bracelet, a Ninjatown blindbox toy, and a Kidrobot Munny zipper pull. I didn’t pull any chase figures, but I was happy with the ones I got! I still haven’t figured out what to do with the bracelet though. I don’t wear bracelets, and I would have to permanently tie it to my wrist, so I’m avoiding that option. I’ll probably attach it to my key chain so I can carry it around with me. Also, it completely flew over my head for weeks that Steph, my Secret Santa gifter, had the same initials as Santa Claus. For the longest time I thought the initials on the note just stood for Santa Claus. Convenient having those initials.
Jin, W., S. Xu, H. Wang, Y. Yu, Y. Shen, B. Wu, & L. Jin (2011). Genome-wide detection of natural selection in African Americans pre-and post-admixture, Genome Research
I serve the corned beef with the usual cabbage and boiled potatoes, but I never cook them in the beef water – I find it makes them too greasy. I usually boil the cabbage in salted water (about 20 minutes.) Since I only have 1 hot-plate burner, I microwaved the potatoes, in a microwave-safe bowl covered with plastic wrap for about 5 minutes. Also, I figured that if I used red potatoes, I didn’t need to peel them. I just cut them in eighths and covered them with water.
Other: Copic Markers, PTI Plum Pudding Satin Ribbon, Popdots
Sunday: Sorry about the abysmal pic, but this is the only one I had, and it is one my four year old daughter took!! We had a jam-packed morning, with Stephen's first soccer game for the season at 8.30 in the morning (games this early should really be illegal), followed by a get together with Irini's school friends at a playcentre. We had a really great time at both!
After lunch, we go to my Dad's house to celebrate with his Mom's side of the family. The crazy tradition with this side of the family is having oyster stew at 10 in the morning. Yuck! I eat the broth with LOTS of oyster crackers. As my Uncle Frank says, in his loud, bellowing voice "You're not a Binford if you don't eat oyster stew on Christmas". We also draw names on Thanksgiving for the gift exchange. And we fill out the same wish list every year.
Windin’ up on my ass .
4. Conclusion: The Anatomy of the Normative
From Paris, to Karachi, Taipeh and Kuala Lumpur, this company, which sold two scorpene-class submarines to Malaysia in 2002, is being investigated and alleged to have paid huge amounts of commission (illegal in France) to top French and Malaysian officials.
The fish used in the Vipak is a Deep Sea Fish not a shallow water fish to help reduce toxins even further. Due to the double distillation process used there is no fishy smell after you take the pill.
Mom: Benson what do you want to be when you grow up?
BOOM!
Le Baiser Salé is located in a little pocket of Paris close to the Pompidou that is busting with bars, cafes and pedestrians. Predominantly a jazz club, it's held its own here for over 20 years offering up concerts, including evenings with a Cuban, African or Antillean twist to the music. A good number of predominate names have passed through here. However, I wasn't there to listen to jazz, so I remained in the small downstairs bar for drinks.
I was out of the design business for a year or so, and my recent re-entry has been on a strictly volunteer basis with the exception of a job I completed just today. I'm OK with that because of the nature of the projects—a community orchestra and public school music groups. I've done some signs and business cards for a profitable music store, but I earned valve oil and a discount on an alto recorder for those jobs.
Dr.: What’s changed? Why do you think things are better?
State Of Play
Say Sorry Again
The international community has an equally major and obvious responsibility to be involved in addressing the question of hudûd in the Muslim world. Thus far, the denunciations have been selective and calculated for the protection of geostrategic and economic interests. A poor country, in Africa or Asia, trying to apply the hudûd or the sharî’a will face the mobilization of international campaigns as we have seen recently. This is not the case with rich countries, the petromonarchies and those considered “allies”. Towards the latter, denunciations are made reluctantly, or not at all, despite ongoing and acknowledged applications of these penalties typically carried out against the poorest or weakest segments of society. The intensity of the denouncements is inversely proportional to the interests at stake. A further injustice!
Is Impairment Reversible?
Add the olive oil to the pan, and add the onions, garlic, and tomato. Cook over medium-high heat for about 4-5 minutes, until the onions are tender and the tomato begins to break down. Add the sausage back to the pan, along with the sauce, the rice, the parmesan, and the herbs. Stir to combine and continue to cook until heated through. Adjust seasonings to taste with salt and pepper.
I hope all my readers are doing well, and I want to let you guys know how much I appreciate you all, the support you've provided over the years I've been writing this blog, and the fact you stick around even when I go long periods without writing much or at all!
Now, onto this weeks challenge.
G’Vine Ruby
Is what I have described really “teaching the Vietnam War as history”? I think so, but I must admit that in my talk to the seniors I skirted the issue by describing it as a “meditation” on the title of Herring’s book. It may not be the sort of history I was taught to do in grad school, but I believe it is a valid approach to a controversial–and significant–topic in this nation’s modern story. Those of you old enough to remember Vietnam (or one of our more recent conflicts) have your own stories to tell, however different they may be from mine, and I encourage you to share them with your students. If you are uncomfortable with a first-person approach, there are other options. You could, for instance, have your students interview parents or other relatives about their memories of Vietnam (or Desert Storm, or Iraq, or Afghanistan) and share these experiences in either oral or written form. Another possibility would be to use local history to relate the impact of the war on the city or town in which your school is located (you could do the research yourself or have your students do it as a class project, using oral history, newspapers, or other resources). Or, you might invite a few guest speakers to present their views of the war to your classes, either individually or in a panel discussion or debate format.
I watched blind skier after blind skier conquer the mountain. Paired with volunteer guides, they made their way to "safety" through the paths of challenge. And determination. And exhilaration. And, well, trust.
“It definitely will be a gradual process,” he said, noting officers likely will issue warnings at first, with citations going to repeat offenders, at the officers’ discretion.
She is seriously one of the kindest people I have ever met.
To the sisters, this means they must make a career of motherhood. They must let nothing supersede that career. Chapter 15: The Righteous Influence of Mothers, Teachings of Presidents of the Church: HaroldB. Lee, (2000)
I've been wearing an orange wrist band I love for the last month. I won it in a contest on Susan Kaye Quinn's blog. The band reads: openBOOKS openMINDS TheLiteracySite.com. The organization raises funds to give books to children, some of whom have never owned a book of their own, and I love that Susan chose to include that during her book launch.
If you enjoyed this review you will enjoy the book even more. You can purchase a copy of After Dark by Haruki Murakami at your local book-stores, or visit your local library, or purchase on-line at:
The Supreme Council also called for public services to resume and urged “the return of normal life in order to safeguard the achievements of our glorious people.” Hopes that Mubarak would resign had been raised Thursday when the military council issued its Communique No. 1, announcing it had stepped in to secure the country, and a senior commander told protesters in Tahrir Square that all their demands would soon be met.
I hope everyone enjoys this weeks challenge! We look forward to seeing your wonderful creations and commenting on your beautiful cards. You have until 3PM on Friday March 9, 2012 to post your card. Remember if you use MFP a Heinrich Company stamps your name will be entered into the drawing twice. Have fun and good luck.
Moving on. This recipe I share with you today needs to be engrained on your brain. It is so simple, and I find its effortlessness is what makes it such a flavorful and succulent bird. The addition of fresh herbs such as thyme, marjoram, rosemary and lavender lends a beautiful fragrance, while lemon and garlic infuse the meat, leaving it perfectly moist.
He then may have said a few other facts about this bug but I didn't hear him because I was too busy picking up my jaw.
I’ve written this because the world has no reason to remember Joel, but I can’t afford to forget him. This is also an appeal to God to remember Joel when he opens graves and brings the dead out–not that God needs a reminder, but I want to remind him anyway. Joel doesn’t have much of a past, but I hope God will give him a bright future. By the way, Joel’s mother Peggy deserves a bright future too, if only because she was really a blessing to my family. She has earned it.
The roomette we shared was tight, but our facing seats reclined and converted into bunk beds, helpful since the trip lasted about 20 hours. Mifi reception was great, so I didn’t have to go through total withdrawal from stat-checking.
10. Retrieve cat from neighbor's shed. Get another pill. Open another beer. Place cat in cupboard, and close door onto neck, to leave head showing. Force mouth open with dessert spoon. Flick pill down throat with elastic band.
Then i thought that if these stain on my lips what would happen if you kissed a loved one? So i kissed Claire:
VB in my opinion try’s very hard to come across as an Anna Wintour wannabe, her issue is that she has neither the talent, knowledge or where with all to carry it off and as a result looks like the vacuous oaf that she is.
On Saturday night, after a good 25-30 samples of some serious beer, I got drunk. There is a note in my little pink notebook after sample 15 (Fuller's London Pride) which says, "I'm starting to feel a little buzzed, finally". Who would have thought that I was just about at the half way point.
4. Honky Tonk Women—Rolling Stones
of a relationship
Letters Of Charles Haddon Spurgeon (1992)
Shops along the workaday stretch of Flatbush Avenue south of the arena that for generations sold unglamorous products like hardware, paint, plumbing supplies, prescription drugs, even artificial limbs, are seeing new businesses pop up that sell high-heel shoes for $3,500 a pair, revealing party dresses, exotic cheeses and, of course, high-priced martinis. Dozens of restaurants and bars, with beguiling names like Fish and Sip and Va beh’ (Italian slang for “It’s all good!”), have sprouted on major thoroughfares and serene side streets.
Let’s start at the beginning. Joffrey hears of an attack on a Lannister camp, and decides to punish Sansa for her brother’s actions. As well as this, he forces two prostitutes to be incredibly cruel to one another for his amusement. It is sometimes easy to forget that Joffrey really is a despicable little weasel, but when watching him threaten his bride to be with a crossbow, it is all too easy to remember. Jack Gleeson is obviously enjoying the fact that he gets to be so evil, and he does a great job with the character, although many haters of the Lannisters will be happy to see him get his comeuppance.
Well for start, I really think the story was interesting, but I had difficulties in getting into it completely. Lucyna is confused, that I understand. And I perfectly understand what she is going through, and though I liked the descriptions of her inner turmoil, I think the author over emphasized it.
Opal Bicone on top is of Swarovski crystal, lovely :)
let me, let me, die…..
As said I was bounced around the Hebden and swear I seen nothing but perhaps heard plenty of late 1940's life. A fox (not the same one) is a mascot of our city team of Carlisle United. I'm presently semi-retired. The company I work part-time (after a lifetime with BT) for is a company that now "makes suits nearly every suit on the High street" (BBC Business world) so it is a strange Hebden Bridge roundabout world with some clothing mills originating in the Pennines.
As I sat there, enjoying the coolness of the shade and watching the cars whiz by, I began to think about the people in those cars. The people in those cars who were oblivious to me. They had no idea that I was there watching them. They were immersed in their own thoughts and their own world as they drove past my vantage point. Indeed, if they had turned their heads to the side as they drove by they could have easily seen me sitting there, but they did not. I might as well have been invisible, for no one thought to look into the bushes the see if I was there. Then the thought struck me… isn’t that so much like us and God?
Many placements will offer the chance to build a body of work that can be used for portfolios and essential skills that can be used on CV. It’s easier to keep these up to date throughout the industrial year and having a complete CV and portfolio will make it easier and less time consuming to apply for jobs during final year.
Editor: “But this first sentence here… Where you wrote ‘worship god’ and ‘honor god,’ what did you mean there?
This poetic picture paints the stark desert landscape and describes a scene I have scene myself out in the desert: where plants are so eager for water they grown back down to the earth any way they can to collect more water for its own livelihood. I like this poem because it reminds me of my own hikes in the desert.
Visual art, by contrast, is considered to be useless except for decorative purposes
So what’s the problem? It’s a leadership challenge boys and girls. That’s all it is. It happens in political parties. Let it happen, argue your case, put it to the members in a fair contest and then accept the outcome.
“Cutting money from education is intolerable – no matter what reason you may have.”
Why is it that no matter what you try to do, whether it be raise your kids as you see fit, live a life of generosity and kindness, try to get ahead in your career (or start a new one), or even travel down the path of self-reflection and improvement, there is always someone who has to voice their disapproval in an attempt to bring you down? I totally hate that – it’s one of my biggest pet-peeves!
My advice: get your manuscript as close to perfect as you can during line edits. Sometimes, circumstances will really make that close to impossible, as with our editing time frame for Sweeter than Birdsong. But when you have the time, go over your manuscript with a fine-toothed comb during line edits! Get rid of every word repetition, every slightly cloudy phrasing, every metaphor that has even a *whisper* of overwriting about it.
But for now you’ll have to survive on this simple drawing from my Age of Mythology series: Bast and a Sphinx. It’s not specifically one of the best drawings in the series, buuut… It’s still mine, so… Bast was the protector of Lower Egypt and cats. Cats were sacred in the Egyptian mythology, so Bast (Or Bastet) really had something to do. In Age of Mythology, she helps villagers and her Sphinx, making it a Criosphinx and a Hierachosphinx. All really strong versus buildings. Enjoy:
Roy Williams, in his book god, actually, makes the claim that the universe is not deterministic, and that this allows for things like free will, conscience and god to exist. He tries to show some natural examples of our non-deterministic world, and he chooses the weather. He makes the claim that Chaos theory shows that the world is deterministic, and this applies to other systems, like our brain. This claim is factually false.
I would love to play you Star Wars The Old Republic/League of Legends/World of Warcraft/Call of Duty but I cannot commit to doing anything that you want me to. I have a job and concerns outside of leveling up so I can get a new mod for my character.
"Love & Hugs" Carol
What is your favorite body part to strength train? Or answer any question you want!
I might even stamp some more tonight...
It is imperative that we treat LGBTQ persons with dignity and respect in all areas of society. We need to ensure that our laws and public agencies do not isolate anyone from fair access to basic rights like housing, healthcare, and employment. I consider myself a strong advocate for the LGBTQ community, and I will continue to work on the issues that affect the gay community in New York City.
The book also examines the phenomenon of Inculturation and Indigenisation started by Robert de Nobili in the 17th century and followed by many missionaries. This involved adopting Hindu lifestyles and methods of worship, a practice which continues to this day all over India, to fool the public. Authentic contemporary accounts of this process are cited in the book. It also provides an evocative picture of the average Hindu’s fight against the predatory forces and thus removes the myth that Hindus were passive players who rolled over and played dead.
Every step I’m taking,
Meditation is like a seed. The better a seed is cultivated, the more it flourishes. Similarly, the more we practise meditation, the better it cultures the entire nervous system and the body. Our physiology undergoes a change and every cell in the body is filled with ‘‘prana’’. And as the level of ‘‘prana’’ in the body rises, we bubble with joy.
So yes, I have hope. I hope, because I believe not all misfortune is on our way. Even though we can’t tell the future I believe we have a chance. I believe nothing is meant to fail, so neither are we. I believe in you. That all is a whole lot to believe in for a mistrusting and paranoid person like me… But I still do.
An Austin high school geography teacher has been arrested and charged with having marijuana and paraphernalia at his home, which is located within 1,000 feet of an elementary school.
I still need to make the lists and schedules for Sister, who is staying here with Oldest, Youngest, and Middle.
Año: 2008
/end-shouting.
We are blessed to have time in this world to expereince life and the beauty of it…
I remember, when I was still at school, a couple of years from leaving, that a priest made the point on just this day that we should not sentimentalise the young Australian men who volunteered to go on the Gallipoli campaign. He pointed out that some were probably on the run from debts, or from unhappy relationships, or even from their own maturity; and surely he was right. At Gallipoli there must have been a ration of criminals and cowards, of fugitives and fools, since every human community includes some of these. But there were as well, quite certainly, brave and generous and very gifted people – British and New Zealand and Australian among others, on the one side, and Turkish on the other. I imagine that they killed and were killed at about equal rates.
Joining them in Part 2 will be Rachel Swirsky (USA).
Serial number on birth certificate is out of sequence with others issued at that hospital. Also certification is different than others and different than twins born 24 hours ahead of Obama.
Bringing me a sweet fragrance
-Deism fails to explain what preserves us from completely and utterly destroying each other and this world with the control and weapons we possess (many times the irrational have destroyed the seemingly rational).
Andorra ~ by Peter Cameron (Andorra)
(or 'You don't know me. But you will.')
(Same as Chorus Chords)
Saabs CargoSET system is another innovation of which there are some very well established rivals in this instance. Elsewhere there are also 120 and 150bhp are also two BioPower engines that run on a non-dating number plate and many won't know you're driving something that's got big miles on the saab 9 7x price of the saab 9 7x photos of Saab's latest load lugger and you'll soon realise why.
Puget Sound Completes Public Offering Of 5.757% Senior Notes Due 2039 For $350 Million 19
This is probably because while writing has always come easily to me, things like drawing, painting and sewing have not. Have I tried very hard to apply myself in these departments? No. Would I like to try harder? Yes. So I’m making a start with baby steps via some messy projects with LLC.
They Not and Da Game (Who is he talking about?)
(Before I go any further, I want to tell any of my current players reading this that I'm not making an attack on them, because they have all made an effort to keep track of stuff. But I'm worrying about any "newbs" that might join the game in the future, as I'm running an "open" game at a FLGS and I want to encourage new players to join.)
It's located in Montevarchi, in Tuscany, so I orchestrated a little side trip a bit north. Arezzo looked to be a good base in the area and I found many hotel options, settling on Badia di Pomaio. I am so glad we made this excursion out of Rome. What we saw of Tuscany was amazing, and Badia di Pomaio is an absolute gem. This former abbey (1645) is located up a hill off of a very (possibly slightly scary to some) windy road. The views of the landscape and the grounds were gorgeous, our rooms (Rosa and Narcisco) were lovely, and the staff was absolutely delightful and truly made our stay an amazing experience. We had supper outside in the courtyard twice and it was wonderful. Our children really enjoyed the pool. It was not a bad drive to the Prada outlet, either (up next).
When Sunni Forrest’s stepbrother accidentally transports himself into a Renaissance painting, she and her friend Blaise set out to bring him back.
I could not put it better than that. I do not understand how the Labour Party could argue all of this in 2010 and now argue for precisely the opposite. The Minister of State, Deputy Shortall, believed at the time it would drive lone parents out of work and would act as a disincentive for them and their children to access education and employment. The Minister is trying to convince us that the same measures will actually assist people into education and employment. It does not add up. Therefore, one can only conclude it is a smokescreen.
Published in the Big Issue In The North, March 12 2012
All morning I've been observing this guy working on the exterior of his house with his dad, who must be in town for the holiday. It's hard to tell if they're talking much, but they're working together, very in-sync. Right now, they're installing a new light on the outside of his garage.
So there you have it: eating, driving, sleeping...and vomiting.
Monsoon - A UK retailer that I've just discovered that has some items in up to a UK22. Sadly, there is no search by size feature on their website, but these are a few of my favourites that are in stock in sizes 16-22 at the moment. They currently have a free international shipping promo going on. It ends on October 31st.
What really prompted this was the number of interviews I seem to have had back-to-back lately where parents (especially first-time parents) seem to be so high and mighty about so many things concerning hiring a new nanny. I realize that your first priority as a parent is to protect your child, and I respect certain questions I am asked. I think good parents SHOULD ask a number of questions about someone they are considering to take care of their children. But I had an interview with a couple recently who had a newborn (their first) and GRILLED me on infant care and the do's and don't's past the point of what I felt was normal. They seemed extremely condescending and actually even handed me a "quiz" they had printed out on baby care. They then informed me that if I took the job, I should know now that I would be recorded on cameras all througout the house at all times that they could look in on while they were at work. In theory, I get this. However, even though I have nothing to hide, this makes me uncomfortable for obvious reasons. What if I have a personal phone call I need to take, or make? How do I know these cameras aren't included in the bathroom? What if I need to change clothes for some reason, is there a safe room to do so? Etc... but also the camera thing bothered me because you either trust me or you don't. If you're such an expert on children and babies just because you recently gave birth to one, but haven't worked in child care for 17 years like I have, and if you're so paranoid that someone does it right, then WHY on earth are you leaving them with someone else? You're sitting here interviewing a nanny to care for your child for 10 to 12 hours a day because you don't want to do it, yet you act as if I'm stupid and don't know anything because I haven't given birth to a child and I'm not a mother. So you're willing to leave your baby with this person who you don't really trust, and then watch videos after the fact to see if anything bad happened?? Basically what you're doing is testing the situation out on your child if you really don't trust the person you're leaving them with in the first place.
Sadly, this is one of the worst beers I’ve had from Saranac. I hope this is not a sign of things to come from the brewery.
I realize that this conclusion seems like folly, hokum or nonsense to committed materialists; it fits into the skeptical scheme of those who ridicule all things spiritual. But this isn’t an issue that can be settled by arguing over it. Each person must go through the process of experiencing second attention and finding out personally if higher reality exists. The proof lies in many areas, but the most crucial is the area we’ve been discussing. If stress ceases to create illness, damage, anxiety and pressure, if impressions no longer haunt us, if memory loosens its grip, then we can say that the world’s wisdom traditions had something valid to say.
‘Paul doesn’t talk a lot about worship, but when he does it’s usually in the context of the Jewish tradition, in discussions about circumcision and sacrifices. That is understandable, since the Old Testament sense of worship had a good deal to do with sacrifice. As worshipers brought sacrifices from their fields and flocks, they brought together everyday life and spiritual practices, the products of daily work into sacred space.
In an interview with TIME magazine,Tyre advises parents to avoid schools without playgronds. She says, "kids need downtime — a break from the rigor" and recommends twenty minutes of recess a day, "at least."
Luckily, the student who was set of fire was not seriously injured, but I think that it is important to spread awareness of the violence that is happening in our schools.
So Don and I headed inside and ordered everything that we thought would possibly fit in our bellies, meaning waffles, fried chicken, collard greens, catfish, cheesy grits and fried okra. And I'll be damned if I didn't wish for awhile that my stomach could have expanded right there on the spot in a freaky pit-stop surgery the exact opposite of gastric bypass. Literally, I think I used about six packets of butter and ate enough fried pieces to wrap myself up in the flaky crusts but it's all good. Nothing a quick walk around central park, ghostly midnight hour and all, and jamming briefly, (ok maybe mostly inside our heads) with the boomboxes and barrel tops lining our way through Harlem.
10-Mile Race: 121 Finishers
Q: What are the inconveniences of living as a celebrity? Is it bearable?
The SITS Girls write about Pinterest's new Terms of Use as part of a series on Pinterest and photography. There are all kinds of links and advice on that page and I got a little lost in it all. But I want to go back and read more when the kids aren't interrupting and I don't have an editing deadline looming.
It’s time to stop being afraid of the water, to believe in myself again and know that no one can ever take that away from me. I need to cast my line. It’s time to go fishing.
4. God still loves me, in spite of my mess.
The president said he welcomed “Congressional action in support of the mission,” which “would underline the U.S. commitment.” But the administration argues this “support” is not required. It says the action in Libya is not war but, euphemistically, a “limited kinetic action.”
at command of
10.I hate fashion
Again, it is important to know whether you, as an adult, are at high risk for suffering a pertussis vaccine reaction, such as being sick at the time of vaccination.
The kotlich is an eastern European cooking pot (bograc in Hungarian), suspended from a tripod over an open fire. The idea of a goulash seemed a perfect match for my new kotlich's initiation.
Spontaneous overflow of words framing sentences that sketch the colors of my mind.
All the kings that ever reigned put together
16.- Avoid introducing Christian lessons upon inappropriate occasions, such as when the child is angry, or right after they’ve done wrong. Christian lessons are best presented when the child is calm and in their normal routine.
We’ve also built new ways to help you stay more engaged with the channels you love. For example, the Channel Feed shows you all the videos uploaded to a channel, as well as playlists and Liked videos across YouTube. The channel feed makes it clear what you’ll get if you subscribe. When you do, this feed will also be published on your homepage so you can keep up with all the latest activity from your favorite channels.
Some other features
DW: Hopefully I’ll have a roster spot locked down. I’m going there with the mindset that I’m there to play on the team. I don’t know what’s going to happen with free agency and who they’re bringing in, but I feel that I’ve put in my time in the American Hockey League and developed the way that they would be happy with and I think I’m going to come in and win a spot.
’Twixt the sky-line’s belting beryl
Women’s activists say the Afghan president’s endorsement of the code seems to imply that laws aimed at protecting women’s rights may be sacrificed for peace negotiations.
So far, the book has sold about fifty copies on Kindle and another fifty print-on-demand paperbacks. That's probably not enough to cover the costs of self-publishing. "I sell as many as I push," Gilmore says.
of each other
Doomed for the wrecking ball before the current owners bought the team in 2002, Fenway now has seats above the Green Monster and an HD video screen — not to mention lights above the upper decks and black and Latin players in the field — all unimaginable when it opened the same week the Titanic sank.
My first idea was to flip over the calendar and see where it was made*. But Wiki says China doesn't observe Boxing Day either. And anyway, my 2011 calendar was made in South Korea, which says "(Canada obs.)" the holiday.
Here's what I liked about the piece:
The following is from the Coos County website:
Dark clouds came from somewhere,
Anyway, I could go on dissecting the saccharine nostalgia of this NPR piece (and I should add that, to Neary's credit, she does get around to injecting some realism, especially by mentioning the horrific and iconic death of Emmett Till). But I'd rather turn to a more critical and insightful view, of both the novel and its effects on different readers.
I have a very special guest today, the wonderful Joylene Nowell Butler, author of Dead Witness. Not only is Joylene an indefatiguable blogger and generous friend to published and unpublished writers alike, she is a talented writer with one book published and a second on its way next year. I am thrilled that she consented to be a guest here today! Joylene says:
The problem is that my heart just wasn't into it. I have no aspirations in life except spiritual development, for myself, my family and those I encounter in need of conversion. It occurred to me that if I took this job, I could kiss becoming a secular Carmelite goodbye. I would have to be totally invested in this job since the center I would be taking over has many challenges in need of resolution. It would mean not being able to help with an upcoming retreat. It would mean missing out on the day of recollection with Cardinal Burke. It would mean getting home late on Rebecca's 16th birthday. It would mean breaking the hearts of the good people I had come to know in my present position.
Because Genesis 1:26-31 says our creation as image-bearers of God took the form of male and female, most Christians believe that sex is fundamentally dichotomous. Many believe further that gender identity should also be dichotomous; there is an essential female and male mind and spirit that complement and complete one another. The existence and experience of persons who are intersexed or transgendered demands that Christians seriously consider whether this taken-for-granted understanding is, in fact, what the Bible is telling us about gender.
This is the part that all too many queriers leave out of the process. In their hurry to get started they let an almost-good query out the door. Almost good won't cut it.
Excuse me while I go take a dump.
2. To make the dumplings: The key when preparing dumplings is to keep the wrapper and the filling from separating. (Tips: Keep wrappers
Matthew 6:7 But when ye pray, use not vain repetitions, as the heathen do: for they think that they shall be heard for their much speaking.
I am all about giving her choices at bedtime so that she feels she has some control over the situation. "Do you want to brush teeth before or after you have your story?" "Do you want to get a drink of water now or after you go potty?" "Do you want to turn off the light or do you want Mommy to?" "Should I stay for 1 song or 2 (on her CD of lullaby music that she likes to listen to as she falls asleep)?" Of course she always says "2" which usually morphs into 3 or 4 by the time all is said and done. Because of everything that she can sneak into the equation in spite of all of the boundaries and consistency and choices. Like, wait, I need to give you another hug and a kiss; I want a kiss on this cheek, too; I need some dreams; more dreams; more dreams; scratch my back; kiss me again; I want some water. But especially the whine. "STAAAAAAAAAY," she will moan with her pathetically tired little voice that takes nerves of steel to resist.
free me by this, your most holy Body and Blood,
“Comedy lags behind music. You had punk in 1978 and you had alternative comedy in 1981/1982… I spent the last ten years watching the music industry change because artists realised Whoa! We’re being treated really badly! We’re propping this up but we’re being ripped off.
Meanwhile in the headwaters of dar al-Islam, the Saudi woman who had the grit to drive a car (verboten in The Kingdom) has been jailed.
To my loving wife, I love you so very much. “Happy Mother’s Day” and thank you for being my Florence Nightingale. You are amazing and I do not know where I would be without you.
That day, in the pew, the words were whispered to me personally, from Jesus Himself, it was the strangest feeling I have ever had.
Namco Fightstick by Mad Catz Specs:
--Can I get a fist pump for being healthy?! Zach and I were both feeling the onset of congestion and sore throats, but we thwarted it with a bag of oranges and sample Emergen-C packets.
Good to see that the country is well informed.
According to the toxicology results, ephedrine was present in Jackson’s urine.
Add a few splashes of green colouring and beat. Add more colour a few drops at a time until you get the colour you want.
It's important that community and business leaders support arts education program will get supporters of Oklahoma will provide you with all sorts of everyday stuff. Feeling anxious to know more about this little paradise, well you are going to suffer, but this Oklahoma football team is deep and extremely talented, so see where your college football celebration - rabid gold-clad fans running to the city oklahoma volkswagen can enjoy fishing or dipping in the city oklahoma single. The Best Western Lawton Hotel & Convention Center Hotel etc.
Unfortunately, as fabulous as it is, I think it's a fail in Babygirl's Room. As hard as I try to like it (because, damnit, I spent 1000 hours gluing 500 effing coffee filters to it!), I just don't love it in her room.
Now, Kim asked me to create ONE card to share today…but I loved the set so much, I just couldn’t help putting together another little card.
Even in old age, you can remember old events, as there are associations with events. You can remember well in old age some passages that you read in schools and colleges. But, you find it difficult to remember in the evening a new passage you read in the morning. The reason is that the mind has lost its power of grasping ideas. The brain cells have degenerated.
YouVersion has a wonderful Bible application. They are continually upgrading the application. Recently, they added an audio portion to the NIV version. I am loving it. I go to sleep with the Bible playing and wake up to hear the Word. I listen to the portion of the Scriptures that I missed because I was asleep.
On a sad note, Jen's 12 year dog (her heart in a dog suit) is undergoing some pretty critical surgery today. Please keep Jen, her husband, their son and most importantly, Maverick, in your thoughts and prayers!
John gives him a Queen’s Guard hat on Teddy, and says do your job, don’t say a word. And he is doing it well.
Only you do not know us. For we have not spoken yet.
I am going to try to resurrect this blog....I do miss blogging, and keeping up with all my blogging, internet friends!! There are SO many more blogs than when I first started blogging, and now there is so much more Facebook and PINTEREST....oh my word. Do you all have pinterest-itis too?? It's like looking at a magazine that has all your favorite topics in it, and being able to tear out the pages you like and store them in a file.....all in five and ten minutes increments. LOVE it. You can find me at www.pinterest.com/SuzanneJoffrion. Now, cookbooks may be obselete, and craft books, and OH MY....what's YOUR favorite part about Pinterest???
I've become a huge fan of your blog and after your January series on getting paper organized, I decided to FINALLY finish up our office. We moved into our new home in September and I threw together an office 48 hours before our housewarming party. While it looked pretty, I still needed to figure out how make the office work for me and get everything into it's right place. I finally finished up and thought I'd share some pictures with you. Here's the final blog post I created: http://www.casagreer.com/2011/02/officewoman-cave-reveal.html
I settle when I allow the world to define and establish who I am, what I can do and where I am going rather than continually pressing on to be have the perfection that Jesus Christ intended for me. The world will tell me I cannot be that person or do those things, but faith in Jesus Christ and by His Power I can do all that and so much more, but I have to keep pushing and pressing into His Kingdom to have it. Quitters will not make it. I have to forget my past and reach ahead never allowing yesterday to define my destiny. I must reach the end of the race to claim the prize therefore I cannot sit on the track and wait for destiny to find me. I must race for the finish and to win!
Grand Teton Brewing
Rival author Eliot, who comes off as Woodward and Bernstein compared to Golenbock, achieved some counterpoint by popping in quotes from secondhand sources. Golenbock, when it comes to Atlantic Yards and Coney Island, sups at the feet of Stuckey and then Thor Equities' Joe Sitt.
Is the issue disability then?
CAVERN OF MOSKK
An example may be useful: Young Earth creationism. Over the last century, a vast array of evidence has been amassed for the theory of evolution by natural selection, and for the age of the Universe- the current theory is that it is 13.7 billion years old, and has of the order of one hundred billion galaxies. This evidence is taught in universities all around the world, continually debated, assessed and theorised. If the Earth is really less than ten thousand years old, how may this be explained? Has God placed false evidence to delude all those academics? Or are they all the slaves of the Devil, conspiring together to delude humanity? Christianity itself refutes young-Earth creationism.
After a month, The Bank sent a reminder and discovered from his contract employers, the Petroleum Corporation that Mr. Arthur Simermeyer, died in the plane crash On October 31, 1999, (an Egyptian Boeing 767 Flight 990) with other passengers on board as you can confirm it yourself via the website below.
Liviana
For all the above reasons, the Church definitely cannot afford to sleep on mobile ministry as a very effective vehicle for accelerating Kingdom growth!
I dare you to look inward today. Do it. In admitting that our own pain is mirrored in these stories, well, at least we walk in realness. And that's the first step toward healing. How can we ask for redemption when we're not authentic about how our lives have really turned out? And how our situations - and hearts - are crumbling around us? And how we're devastated?
David Fernbach’s paper on the German Communist leader Paul Levi, by contrast, emphasized the ECCI’s destructive role in driving Levi out of the movement. Fernbach is editor of In the Footsteps of Rosa Luxemburg, a new collection of Levi’s writings. In quite another context, Russian historian Alexander Pantsov presented the results of new archival research which, he suggested, showed the ECCI playing a crucial role in shaping the Chinese Communist Party leadership through the 1930s and the Second World War. (Pantsov was forced to cancel his trip to London; his paper was read by Sebastian Budgen.) Gregor Benton, a British scholar of the Chinese Communist movement, offered an alternative view of this question.
One thing Joel talked about was the thought paradigm of the video game generation. If the game doesn't go as planned, or if you die, or if you lose a battle just Restart and try again at the beginning. Take farmville on facebook - my kids played for awhile - plant crops and minutes later harvest time If harvest is forgotten and the vegetables all wither and die, you can "unwither" them. Now put these kids out in the garden plant some seeds and then, well, wait. Hope a frost doesn't hit, hope it stays warm, hope the chickens don't scratch out the seeds, hope the cutworms don't nibble the seedlings.....There is no restart except from scratch, sometimes not until the next spring. Now plant something that takes 3 or 4 months to mature....in our instant society with instant dinners, instant pizza, instant Kraft Dinner for goodness sakes.....Do people get it that it takes 2 months for a pickling cuke to grow and another 6 weeks to pickle??? A tomato plant has to be started in early March for fruit in July?? A strawberry plant has to be nutured through spring, summer, winter and spring before harvest.....and then all might be lost with a frost at full blossom? There is no restart. One thing goes wrong and it's done. No redo, no do-overs, no try again.
“Wait, you want to buy wine? I can tell you where to buy wine. Come!” The hostess guides us outside and points directly across the street to a grocery store—one that the hotel staff has conveniently neglected to tell us exists—and assures us that “They sell wine.”
No "meter running"
toiletry products
My debut young adult novel Dark Parties chronicles a country that has closed itself off under an electrified dome. For hundreds of years, no one and nothing has penetrated this barrier. The citizens of Homeland are growing to look more and more alike.
"That's why you were dressed like an Angle?"
That's all for now. Hope you all have a wonderful weekend.
Regardless of the whys and the why nots, these couples pledged to have sex for seven days straight. So how do they feel about this? The men are excited… and the women are afraid their “lady parts” will be sore.
I scare myself sometimes, that I still feel this way. I sometimes wonder what might happen if I was to just let go. Let go of everything, let go of all the hurt, anger, fear, rejection, lies, deceit, injustice, hate and love. What if I was to just start again – a blank canvas. But that doesn’t appeal to me. I’m proud of who I am. I’m proud of how far I’ve come and I’m proud that despite this ongoing battle inside, I’m fighting for what I want and what I deserve.
Rel closed his eyes, sat back, and took a step forward. He almost imagined he could hear the mad child’s scream of frustration in the rush of air that carried him up the chimney, but even that was strangely muted. When he opened his eyes, he was walking along the narrow plume of smoke from a chimney and hearth that stood, bereft of their house, on the edge of a cliff. The smoke blew out across the chasm - the bottom was covered in what looked like a lush, dark-blue carpet - and Rel blew with it, each step carrying him dozens of feet.
“What have we found, Vanya?”
A thought for World Vegan Day. World Vegan Day marks the start of World Vegan Month every year, commemorating the coining of the term, ‘vegan’ and the founding of The Vegan Society in November 1944.
Mail and Guardian 20 April 2012.
"I was freaking out," says Nicole, "so I told her to tell him I wasn't there and I went and hid in the back office for the rest of the day. I didn't know what to do and at this point I was pretty scared because he knew where I worked."
Poor No More offers solutions to Canada's working poor. The film takes three Canadians to a world where people do not have to beg, where housing is affordable and university education is free. They ask themselves: if other countries can do this, why don't we?Which world is this?!!
And look – it even works with sushi.
‘We are concerned about sites that sell material without having the right to do so, and would work with the advertisers on such sites, and the credit card companies, to cut off their sources of funding and reduce this harm.’ Not sure they’ve thought this one through.
Well, we know the answer … even if the result is not so easily illustrated … so here goes:
Rollerball (JONATHAN! JONATHAN!)
By William Sullivan
I don’t want a love like you see on the telly, in the soap operas? A love that fades in weeks because somebody remembers a massive part of their past. That’s the shitty thing about soap operas – nobody has got a dam memory! How the fuck are you supposed to learn from your mistakes without a memory?!
All these thoughts went through my mind as we drove home the other day – dancing along as best I could while in the driver’s seat – listening to Bolero.
Enjoy your Saturday!
It’s just a flat out lie, and we all know it. Although he’s not all bad, he has good taste in cars, but a touch of bad luck. He and his frosted tips had their 2008 Lamborghini Gallardo stolen roughly a year ago.
Clean the ribs and trim off excess fat. Cut each rack in half.
Sienna spent 3 1/2 weeks in Texas!!! It was horrible for me, but lovely for her. She shopped, spent time with cousins, and partied hard. My parents had the time of her life with her there, I know this because my days were so dull without her! There are some parents that need breaks from kiddos, but I can truly say that I cherish each and every sweet drop of time with mine. They are so utterly perfect. A part of my heart was gone the whole time she was gone. I'm so glad she's back! Now I have an excuse to go get snow cones more often.;) I feel like she grew a foot while she was gone. She seems so much older and funnier. She got home and informed me that Disney Junior isn't cool anymore. I have my awesome 10 year old nephew to thank for that. It's taken a week, but she's back to watching her innocent cartoons in the mornings. She has been full of funny tid bits and stories, one of which happened before she left, but unraveled while she was gone.
Millet Bread (page 101)
A black knitted sweater (SPS), with a hole in the back, underneath I'm wearing a black racerback top (Hunkemoller). It has this awesome rose on the back with sequins that fits inside the hole of the sweater.
Challenge: You don’t have enough time, you are spread to thin and/or you don’t delegate much
The link gadget will close on October 4th at 11.59pm CST.
and sentiment from K&C company.
I want a future where those fights are so thoroughly won that my grandchildren can't even imagine a world where there is any question about them.
John 6:66-69
plan.”
The chillies and Capsicums are beginning to put on a bit of growth now too after a slower than usual start, and the aubergines are being their usual slow and steady selves.
He gets me. He knows the difference between when I'm tired and when I'm really hanging on by a thread. And he knows how to navigate both of those minefields effectively.
If this passes, will the Obamans then quote this as one of Obama's success? Because it wont be a success, it will be another empty promise, like so much of what has come out of the Obama administration.
these fish frys have rotted my brain maybe
Anderson who became head of the thai restaurant wilmington delaware and large number of prior offenses and other items. White Eyes was murdered for deeds he had no part of Delaware for legal entity formations and incorporations. They pride themselves in offering the thai restaurant wilmington delaware and flexible business formation statute in the thai restaurant wilmington delaware, there are a publicly traded company or desire to be the thai restaurant wilmington delaware and financial landscape is the thai restaurant wilmington delaware in the thai restaurant wilmington delaware. The court has been credited with writing important modern U.S. corporation case law. Delaware's State Government is business-friendly and accessible. The Division of Corporation is a hybrid business vehicle that combines some of the thai restaurant wilmington delaware, responsive and efficient state agencies. They have a legal existence separate and distinct from its owners, and its owners and managers receive the utmost protection available.
Now, I can pretty much guarantee that the first thing that springs to any one's mind when they think about over the knee boots is "hooker." Like if we were playing free association on a Saturday night while drinking hot toddys or whatnot and I say, "over the knee boots," you say, "hooker."
Sam would ride ahead, circle back to us, and go again.
Mon. Feb. 6th - Under the Half Shell - San Antonio, TX - w/Michael Watts
After arriving back home Saturday morning I literally hit the ground running....I'll be back with updates, exciting news & a Dottie Angel giveaway of the UTMOST kind SOON I promise but for now....I wanted to share some AWESOME news with you....!!!!!
Or is there some other factor?
There was a long awkward phase when I was just beginning to present myself as female. I was not especially good at it, it’s the sort of thing that takes practice. What I am not exactly recalling is how I dealt with it during my earliest sessions with Lin. I have a vague memory of changing in the bathroom before and after my sessions, but I’m not convinced that’s a real recollection. It could be.
The “Hell On Earth” Hell
My goodness, sewing black fabric can be hard on one's elderly eyes, can't it? The top recently cut out is now being made and I am having a coffee break before sewing on the neckband. I've sewn black in the past, but not black knit - it seems to be blacker than woven fabric, if that's possible.
Now it’s your turn. What are some of your favorite TV shows of 2011?
Hüsker Dü - New Day Rising - 1985
The is my last week as Artist for the month of March '12 and I have had so much fun creating the cards for Our Craft Lounge stamps. My last card uses the Love is in the Air stamp set from OCL - love these balloons and the sweet sentiments. I masked the smaller ballon and stamped the larger one behind it and then stamped them separately on a different paper where I colored them with copies, cut them out and then adhered them over the initial stamped images.
As the discussion goes on, the Metro police retreats into their van and waits for us to go away. Don’t leave, they are just waiting for you to leave so they can beat us up, the young and old men surrounding us say. We stand with them and wait. Time goes by; finally the police van approaches us again, reversing. Leave, they say to us, a sense of threat in the lady Sergeant’s voice. After several minutes of arguing back and forth – with her sitting in the car and me standing on the street by her car window, plastic soup cups in my gloved hands (it is one of the coldest nights of the year) – she says to me that she will have to arrest me for loitering if I refuse to leave. The mood is getting tense; finally, we need to leave. There is still another stop to go to. We give our telephone numbers to a young man who has been taking the lead in discussing with the police to call us in case the Metro police does return to beat them up.
Starting Weight: 304.6
Husband says, really quite Huffily,
Remember that tune we used to whistle is missing you.
Ibis stood up and went over to look at the chicken. It seemed rather ordinary, other than it having taken a position on Bantum’s chest. It looked to the side, blinked, and gave a tiny little “Cluck”. He then jumped with flutter to the ground and began pecking at the dirt, and that action woke Bantum up.
Solution: If your QR code can’t be scanned, it’s just taking up valuable space. Thorough testing is extremely important, and be sure to follow these design-related best practices to improve reliability. Also, remember that your audience should be able to access the Internet (no subways) with the ability to stop and scan (no billboards).
He refused to pay and even sent the council a sample of Elliott’s poo to do a DNA test on.
followed by thorns
1 grow
There are two of them (of the 5-6 seeds we planted... hoping that's not a bad sign!) just like this one, but the picture I took of both of them was all fuzzy thanks to all of the humidity fogging up my camera lens yesterday evening.
I’m working on a new book, with a female narrator and I hope to be able to tell people more about it quite soon. I love writing fiction, especially YA, and I hope there will be more to come.
Australia
Either way, Jose Canseco continues to make headlines. Former major leaguer and the man who blew the whistle on the steroid scandal that rocked Major League Baseball, Jose Canseco is back in the news.
Well, it’s officially spring and if you’re like some of my friends, you’ve taken it upon yourself to get into a massive Spring Cleaning session. You’re dusting. Getting rid of clothes you haven’t worn since the last time you spring cleaned. You may even be getting rid of old TVs and buying new ones or buying new curtains and painting your walls. Whatever it is – you’re doing a lot more than me. As I admitted the other day, when my life is in shambles and I have too much going on, my apartment tends to reflect it – in every place except for in my shoe closet.
I've seen on some blogs about 'Tatting Tuesday". If someone out there reading this knows what that is, could you please explain it to me? I'd like to 'sync up' if necessary.
Next, we'll break the 2008 Upper Deck First Edition Update. Each pack boasts a "Starquest" insert. I've been noticing with these first Edition Packs a pattern... every single one I've opened is a "common"... with other UD products I have seen a wider variety, which leads me to believe that all (or almost all) of the First Edition packs feature the common inserts. Honestly, this is not a product I would buy on its own.
Lager cleanses the palate to leave the mouth fresh, a bit like having light dry white wine with a pepper steak, whereas most wine interacts with what you eat.
The crack beer journalists at Beer at 6512 (ahem) rarely post a full press release. But as press releases go, this one from Ska Brewing Co. is a gem, and heavy editing would only kill the humor. We have here perhaps the definitive beer competition humblebrag. Take a look:
Hard Times
Here's the story. Crestwood Illinois is a small village near Chicago. A staunch Republican, Chet became its mayor in 1969 promising low taxes, continuously posting personal, hokey political messages for the town to read on a changeable sign in front of the hall. Any money saved on spending would be refunded to the townspeople, in person, by a grinning mayor who shook their hands as they came to pick up their money. Seriously, they had to pick it up personally from the mayor in a fantastic public relations ploy.
Mitchell actually did scenes where a conflict about a scene would be discussed (like, say, whether or not a funeral would happen), and then the actual followup scene (the funeral) would be left off. I thought it would be jarring, but it actually made the story flow beautifully. At no point did I ever think to myself, “Is this scene over? I really want to know what’s going on with so-and-so!”
But for now I am celebrating.
"All stories have theme? What about Twilight?" someone asked with a snarky tone.
However, “reasonable force” is very subjective, according to criminal lawyer Joshua Sambanthan, who said it is something that be “easily abused”.
I’m just so overwhelmed by God right now. He is so good. I don’t know why I’m still so shocked by this. A lot of times, I’ll pray and pray and pray for a miracle, but in my mind I don’t have much faith because I am also a very realistically logical person. God blew me away. It was torn a month ago – clearly – from the MRI and all of the pictures, there was no doubt. And now it is completely healed?! God beat Dr. Matchett to it I guess(:
The Marvel’s Project (Variant Edition) #1 signed by Gene Colan with small, original black & red marker drawing of Daredevil's head on the cover – winner (cgrew)
I thank the Farmer for being EARLY, I thank Joyce for her help with Momma, I thank Cam-Man for co-operating with me, I thank the youngest Son for calling his Momma, BUT, I thank the Electrician for keeping the home front going while I do what I do.
Can you feel the love? Valentine's Day is rapidly approaching and you can fell the love in the air! Today, I want to share a Valentine's card. This time I used Ladybug Tilda Magnolia stamp. The Love Me stamped paper is from My Mind's Eye, all the other papers, the ribbon and ladybug embellishment are from my stash. The stamp was coloured using the following Copics:
Did I hear someone in the back row mutter cheap bastard?
For a while I’ve had this niggling desire to go out and do the rather cliche act of time-lapsing the stars. On Saturday night the quality of dark coincided with the clearness of the sky and I was able to do exactly that. I find these examples rather … well, uninteresting, but they are reasonable demonstrations of the art. Best viewed in 1080p full-screen.
Theresa and me at "Modernes Japan Stammtisch", which is a monthly meet up of our institute for Japanese Studies from our university! Even though I graduated some while ago I love to meet my former teachers! (Why do I look so tired on this pic?? :)
Locomotive pictures I bought from a friend some years ago.
Instead of:
For aspirations, motivation, and tenacity to succeed, a favourable outcome must be assumed. It is the imagined outcome – when contradictory information is ignored, - which sustains most human affairs. Endeavours are wrapped in delusions. Humans cannot function without these delusions, be they delusions of immortality or the certainty that an intended outcome will be successful. If these are stripped away the psycho-personality collapses.
It is with the hand of God present in the life of the leader that will give them authority to be heard by the people and for them to follow.
El Grande
It’s another deadline day at Ibrox – this time for Best and Final Offers to be submitted to administrators Duff and Phelps by those wishing to buy Rangers FC PLC (in administration). But has anything actually changed in the long running saga?
Pentacles/Coins: career, educational endeavors and finances.
For this tiny baby, you are not the centre of the universe - you ARE the universe. Nobody is more important to her, than you. She already loves you beyond comprehension. Being your first child, she has already taught you more about love than anybody else you have ever met. And all in her first day of life.
Punch out round circles from the seaweed using a seaweed puncher, I'm using a Doreamon puncher for this. After that, stick the seaweed on the cut out kamaboko. It sticks pretty well for mine, but if you have problems with it, you can add a dab of mayo.
Meow
And so, as I glanced at the labels to verify the pride of the U.S.A. in my purchases, I was… disappointed, to say the least. In fact, I was absolutely shocked! There were almost no products in Target that were made in America. Bangladesh, China, Indonesia, Vietnam, and other known sweatshop imported products filled the shelves. And while an occasional Made In America product was prominently featured, most of these were from tried and true conglomerates and mega-corporations that no doubt manufacture in such bulk that their prices can barely (just barely) compete with those of the enslaved third-world. And so the thought of seeing a mom-and-pop produced gadget or gizmo, or at least one that hasn’t been bought up by these large monopolistic conglomerates – who keep the “local” or “small town” name on their hostile taken-over products for marketing purposes – flew right out the window.
Let's just say Lumpy is pretty keen on the old fodder. From the first bowl of baby rice, he's gobbled it all down with wild enthusiasm. The only time he has faltered was over Christmas, when I tried to sneak one too many Brussels sprouts into his puree. and even then he still had a good go before the disgust overwhelmed him.
Chef Stefano described the artichokes frittata as similar to "scrambled eggs". I have to say the method of preparation is extremely intriguing, it was my first time seeing eggs first fried, then blended and put through a whipped cream dispenser before being served with steamed artichokes and croutons. This really is contemporary Italian cuisine.
But, despite the fact I haven't actually been anywhere, I am back. Back from the depths of way-too-negative vibes I experienced yesterday. Which weren't good, to say the least. Infact, I feel more than a touch stupid for venting feelings I should have kept to myself out loud, which is why I've now deleted yesterday's blog post, despite the fantastic, supportive comments I received from people. And I thank each and every one of you for those words of support and encouragement. They really meant a lot.
SoHo Rocks.
08-Phantoms-Crossfire.mp3
Time spent recharging your batteries and maintaining your physical and mental health is not wasted. It is a necessity. Time frittered away attending to tasks easily achieved buT relatively inessential to your ultimate goal is wasted - a criminal waste of a precious resource.
Served on draft at the airport, it smells of a sweet malt lager. It's straw clear with a white head yet some lace. First draught gives me medium body, slightly bitter with slight bitter aftertaste. Another draught after getting used to it, I can find the slight citrus and low malt. It's not as good as the other abbaye ales. It tasted better and the flavors more pronounced as it warmed up and I started eating a chicken club sandwich. I will say that this one is complex, and I need more work to truly evaluate these complex beers. You can't exactly go back to Old E.
Has anything been solved by the loss of this monster? No, he actually killed more Muslims than infidels. His death doesn’t make me sleep any sounder either. No, the wackos will continue their murder and mayhem in the name of Mohammed. But I do feel compassion and a sense of closure for the Americans and their families of September the 11th, a day I will never forget. Peace be with you.
Among its proposals is that East London be renamed Gompo; that King William’s Town become Qonce; Grahamstown, Nxele; and Uitenhage, Qhagqiwa. If the committee has its way, it would also change Port Elizabeth to Nelson Mandela.
Payne, Brett (2008) A. & G. Taylor of the Royal Studio, 57 London Street and 63 London Road, Derby, Derbyshire Photographers' Profiles.
Henry Roth (1906-1995) wrote novels that were always a literary event when published. He’s perhaps best known for Call It Sleep (1934), but he was always highly regarded. Now, fifteen years after his passing, another novel, An American Type, has been published ($25.95, W.W. Norton). Set in 1938, it tells the story of his alter ego, Ira Stigman, who at 32 years of age is standing, in his words, “at the portentous crossroads of maturity.” His first novel has been published to wide acclaim and he is doted upon and provided for by an older women, the alter ego of Eda Lou Walton who was Roth’s lover at the time. In the novel, Ira is experiencing the angst of initial success and keeps re-writing the first pages of a second novel. His relationship with his lover feels like a Faustian contract he’ll never escape, and he is terrified of what stretches out before him. Written in the years before his death, this is a wonderful look inside the life of authors to whom success has come swiftly and unexpectedly. Fans of Roth will enjoy this along with anyone who wants a look inside the life of novelists who must draw on their own lives for inspiration. It is funny, touching, and a lot of fun to read.
background. The soft, sour, fruity aftertaste is long and
Also more problematic for this theory is that servicing viewed increased foreclosures and the subsequent speed-up as a counter-cylical strategy. Let’s go to a Countrywide Earnings call from Q3 2007:
Remember, even if you goofed up somewhere, its okay. Keep those dreams alive, you'd be so incomplete without them. Even if you got disappointed or hurt, don't lose faith. Shit happens sometimes, right? . Promise me, you haven't let go off any of 'my' dreams and have a brand new set to look forward to for yourself.
MRI scan measurements showed that walking as little as one mile (1.6km) a day significantly affects brain volume nine years later, and dementia 13 years later, but walking more than nine miles did not increase gray matter volume any more.
5. I have discovered that I can read Kindle books on my iPod. Yes, you have to turn a lot of “pages”, but it’s still cool. It’s a free app – first one that pops up in the Apps store if you search on “Kindle”. Not that I buy a lot of (or any) Kindle books from Amazon. However, I did discover that sometimes books come up priced at $0. That’s right: free! I keep an eye on Kindle Review for free books.
But I hate feeling like a fraud or hypocrite.
So my cousin was going to the football game with her boyfriend of 12 years now. Then it was 11 years but I digress. So we were taking care of her two kids while they were at the game. And before her and her boyfriend were going to go shopping if he didn't have to work, so it ended up he had to work. So she texted me asking if I would go to the family get together if she would and I said whatever fine. So my parents took the older one with them and the boy and I had the younger one since had to take a nap. And we chilled out while waiting for the game to end and her to come over. Then we went off to my aunts house. I don't remember how long we were there exactly but it was really weird and awkward. One of my cousins was drunk and he was trying to get the youngest boy to come to him and he didn't do it which sort of amused me. But it was really annoying to me that he was drunk in the first place. Anyways we were going to have the kids do their presents. But no one stayed in the room and they all went into the other room. Which was super annoying. Before that grandma handed out cards with money in them. The boy got one which was good. And then the problem. Grandma left out my cousins boyfriend again.... see they say they are not racist but its pretty clear they are. And she just gave one card with some money for my cousin and her two boys. Well she was stewing and then the present thing didn't make anything better. It was pointless why we even came. We could have had a great time just staying at the house. But we tried. Its just never been the same since my great auntie died. So we were trying to make the best of it but I went in the other room and they were opening presents in there! And I was like what the crap. But I was just trying to give away the ornaments the boy and I made. Then my cousin blew up said she was done and well since I was her ride I was getting all ready to leave. Then it was a screaming match cussing all over and my uncle telling her to get out of his house and shes not welcome anymore. And grandma screaming that she isn't racist and that he never said thank you so that’s why she was mad. And then my grandpa who was drunk but trying to keep the peace and calm Heidi down and my aunt who tries to get into everyones business and oh boy it was quite the mess. So we high tailed it out there and went back to my house to wait for everyone to come back and then talk and later my parents took her and the boys home. But oh boy it was a great mess. Christmas day was good though haha.
that I must impart to you.
Well...... my GPS must have been picking it's nose---because my fellow couchsurfer had driven me past Pepe's, and the GPS was not leading me anywhere near where she drove me.
"No lesson is valuable which does not promote self-activity by making the child think, exercising its powers of narration or reproduction, or laying the ground-work for some future mental habit, making the idea given a well-spring of activity."
Local food supports local farm families.
6. To serve: Frost the cupcakes with the ricotta frosting, top with fresh raspberries and drizzle the balsamic reduction over top. Serve immediately.
I spent some time in Zurich too, which I have to say I didn’t enjoy so much. I think having spent so long in the countryside, going into a city felt a little claustrophobic, and underwhelming. So I didn’t explore it much, but I did manage to see creative confectionary treats being crafted by Master Chocolatiers of Switzerland! That alone was worth the trip. I was explained some of the interesting techniques used to create the right consistency for pouring chocolate, how certain designs were done and textures created. Enjoy the pics, yes the chocolate was GOOD ;-P
Noting that a Poly board member projected the cost of Rogers Hall renovations at $200 million, the memo suggested that figure as a benchmark. Further, it argued that the Memorandum of Understanding (MOU)--an apparent successor to the MCC--set specific investments independent of Poly’s assets, to transform the school to a top-level engineering institution.
I get a lot of fan mail from readers telling me how much they love my books, and while I truly enjoy hearing from them and appreciate the fact they’ve taken the time to email me, I’ve started passing on information telling them what they can do to help me out. Whether readers want to “see” it or not, publishing is a business. Publishers don’t buy and publish books, series and authors that aren’t selling. And the only way for an author to increase her readership and guarantee there will be additional books down the line is to sell more books.
I made this recipe up years and years ago & have been loving it ever since. Several of my besties also love it and I know they cook it at theirs too. Happiness making.
Authorship and Copyright Notice : All Rights Reserved : Satya Sarada Kandula : All Rights For Sourced Material Vest With the Source.
During and after viewing, when I thought on Tree of Life, I couldn’t help but compare it with Lars von Trier’s Melancholia, one of my favorite films of 2011. Von Trier uses his own experience with clinical depression to spin out a story of the world’s demise, inspecting how different people deal with the certainty of impending doom, and asking whether human beings really deserve to survive. This is weighty stuff, for sure, and there are some tough moments in Melancholia, but the entire film is underpinned by von Trier’s sense of humor, something that really connected me to its story and its characters. Tree of Life, on the other hand, kept me at arm’s length (the effect all of Malick’s films seem to have), asking me to admire and contemplate in an intellectual manner alone. And there’s a lot to admire and contemplate, for sure, but not a lot to love.
So instead of filling the hole in our hearts with the love of Christ, we fill it with taking care of the earth. We fill it with good causes, but not things that cause us to draw closer to God. I want society to remember the gift that is free. And that is what the Easter season is about. Not bunnies, not Earth day, but the free gift of Grace given by God through Jesus.
In a couple of days we go back and get his ashes---yes, they burn all of the fake money---and take his remains to a temple and place them in a wall for the dead.
unemployed, as opposed to
I had a phone consultation with Lyedie Lydecker a few days ago. With a messy studio, new projects looming, new work I want to do, small orders I need to fill, upcoming knee surgery and the resulting loss of income (I can’t do my big League of NH Craftsmen’s Fair this year), I’ve been overwhelmed with how to best use my remaining non-invalid time. I’d ask Lyedie to help me sort it all out.
"White House Press Secretary Robert Gibbs expounded on Obama’s commitment to legislative repeal of “Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell” as he acknowledged that the president hasn’t yet reached out to senators to lobby them on the issue.
SAS4Kids wishes you all a wonderful holiday season full of smiles and family and fun!
I have your Uncle Marvin on the phone right now from St Paul. He says that the Western Union agent told him that 7 Albermarle Street isn't a valid Western Union address. Are you sure that it's the right location? He's sending $4,500.00 to be on the safe side since plane tickets are so gosh darned expensive these days.
I had a dream the other morning, just before waking that I want to share with you. I was in a small boat at night on the Hudson River that traveled from island to island and around Manhattan. In the boat was a beautiful woman. When she spoke to me, she engaged me with such genuine passion and she had a special way of holding my hands and gently rubbing them as we spoke. I was utterly moved by her presence and how intently she delivered her message and how well she listened with her ears, heart and hands. I wanted to become her.
I will always love you
The EV value is related to a sensitivity of 100 ISO. When the sensitivity varies you have to compensate this variation with a different combination time/aperture. For example, passing from 100 iso to 200 iso i'll have to halve the shutter time or the aperture opening.
There seem to be some common features of the films listed as featuring BPD the characters are often portrayed as having almost all of these traits: female, stalkers, pathological liars, manipulative, attention seeking, no sense of guilt, no empathy, no remorse, dangerous, murderous, suicidal, self-harmers, callous, impulsive, promiscuous, criminal and much more. Now while some of these are BPD traits many of them are not, actually being more sociopathic or psychopathic in nature – hence overall I am not convinced that the true condition being portrayed in many of these films is BPD at all.
Plus, I wanted to climb onto the latest ‘wave-breaker’, to make images of the changed harbour view! The main (remaining) pier taken from the other side! With the city behind it! Unique! What an opportunity.
Triple E Enterprises in N. Dakota offers clients a chance to hunt exotic wildlife – including elite specimens in Sector C. When people and livestock in the area start dying, CDC investigator Mike Shafer teams with veterinarian Donna Bailey to find out why. Their search for Patient Zero leads to the Triple E compound and a CEO willing to kill to protect a secret thought extinct for 10,000 years.
Last night standing at the point where Andrew died, listening to those who knew him, I noticed the traffic investigator’s markings on the pavement. Still there a week later. Graphic evidence of the violent nature of this mishap. I won’t go into details.
So this year I roamed or better yet skulked around the various small press tables from the esoteric to the conventional-- like the Paris Review-- all right- Paris Review-we know all ready--you're wonderful-- we know.
Here’s a picture of my hot mama-friend wearing “Blush” from Collection 8. Loving the colour on her, knowing how much she loves pink omg. We did some baking at her house on Saturday and we felt like we just climbed a mountain!!! We made a Red Velvet cake and about a dozen of cupcakes. And as you can tell from the pictures below, we aren’t that great in frosting. That’s why we needed to get cute little candied-hearts to salvage the presentation.
If he had added something in his first comment, it would have been fine. Something in the general direction of “I understand not everyone is as lucky as me, and I hope their opinions were listened more”. Then I wouldn’t have felt he was going all Nelson on me (HA-haw!) but more like acting between a bridge between me and the guy who posted the status. As well as being relevant and empathetic to both of us.
9:30 – 10:15 a.m.
The boys are bearing up well under the weight of their many nicknames. As embarrassing as some of them are. Mr8, however, has drawn the line at being addressed as 'Doodlebug'* in public. He believes it to be undignified. I'm not even sure where that one came from. It's relatively new and I am doing my best to confine it's use to the Fibro. But it's just such a nice word. It really rolls off the tongue, don't you think?
I know I have told my girls there are never any dumb questions. But when you see someone curled up on the couch, with a blanket wrapped around them, and there eyes are closed, and my mouth could or could not have been open.....I say it was closed.
One of our dry cows didn't show up at the feed trough this morning. After searching for her for nearly an hour, we found her on the ground with rear leg paralysis. We helped her up with a front-end loader, but she could not stand under her own power. After working with her for a while, we all agreed that she had very little chance of recovery. She was in obvious distress and pain, and we decided the most humane course of action was to euthanize her.
An ice cream/toppings bar is a really fun thing to do for summer entertaining. Since our ice cream story in InStyle, we're seeing this trend everywhere! If you want to surprise your guests during 4th of July entertaining, this will really make a splash! Simply swap out the color palette for red, white and blue.
A punter? In the 3rd round?
I have my own donation page, and I'd love it if you could please click the link and donate whatever you can, knowing that you're helping the precious, incredible, strong, and brave young children that are treated in CHEO every single day.
As the afternoon progressed it became clear that although the two guitars thing is impressive in a man-with-two-heads kind of a way, Branigan would be a bit of a star even without the geekery.
1/2 tsp ground allspice, slightly heaped
In a medium to large saucepan, add rice and water. When water boils, lower the flame and cook on low for 45 minutes.
Obviously, it is not just TEN things I've learned from you, Mom! It's probably 1000x10. Everything I am is because of you. Because you have always believed in me. Always saw me to be more than I was. Or what I thought I was. You are the strongest woman I know. You are kicking life's ass at 71 years of age - you are beautiful, you are full of life, and you keep showing up on my doorstep everyday to watch your crazies! I LOVE you beyond measure!
When they are that little and learning, when they want to do it, the opportunity has to be there!!
Here are the questions Tom asked:
Jack Wagner and Anna Trebunskaya danced the foxtrot. Little intro Len won't like. Dance was graceful and fun. This is the first week, and he did well, according to Bruno and Carrie Ann. Len not as much. Score: 8, 7, 8 = 23
What’s one of the top 5 questions about pet insurance? “When is the best time to buy?” If you’ve recently gotten a new puppy or kitten, the answer to that question is “right now.”
Master British gardener Alys Fowler guides those with small spaces through simple steps to create a bountiful, thriving garden. After covering the processes of planning, composting, pruning, harvesting, propagating and even rescuing neglected plants, every reader, no matter how minute their space is, can create a gorgeous oasis. Paperback: 192 pages.
As they marveled, the party passed between the enormous statues, which formed a narrow pathway between them. Beyond the statues was a huge iron gate that went from the floor to the ceiling with great thick bars the width of a man’s wrist. The gate was swung wide open and so they walked through.
Enjoy with some vanilla ice cream or on its own.
I've never gone hungry or always felt safe
“What if it is, though? One of us should head to the Drake to make sure that things are in order. I could be back in an hour if I left now. It’s not far. And the list can’t be that long, Janus. You’re an insufferable oaf, but people like you for the most part.”
3) Finally, my Boden affiliate sent me a wonderful coupon for those of you that like to have an extra % off with free ship and returns.
Chick a Boom...Daddy Dew Drops
* washing cars in a company parking lot
The late Vince Gironda, aka "The Iron Guru," was one of bodybuilding's most-influential personalities and one of the greatest physique trainers of all-time.
“This has angered some BNP members. A senior source inside the party said: ‘We are supposed to be showing Britain that we support clean-living family life and are a genuine alternative to the big three parties.
Being of the very averagely foot-sized demographic of 7.5, I never thought about the fact that some people can't buy their shoes at a store. Then I was tasked with finding size 14 womens shoes for a man. Yes, I am deep in costuming for Hairspray at this point and the things I need to find are getting more and more odd. First, a "buty pant". Next, the largest bra I could find at Wal-Mart. Hairdresser's capes that can be worn as dresses. And yes, these very hard-to-find shoes. You would think I was costuming Priscilla, Queen of the Desert!
For at least three weeks, I’d been having serious abdominal cramping. Sometimes it was off and on throughout the day; other times, constant.
(The Ghost of Christmas Present, MARTIN LUTHER KING, JR., materializes behind OBAMA.)
*both of us really laughing hard*
Well, someone could choose to include bacon in the food or even theme itself. But you have to be careful not to be super weird about it.
Great drink.
Stage Two
When I was little, I loved getting new notebooks and tablets for school.
ANANSI TALES
Blessed be x
About three weeks later, I called the furniture store and they said they would not be sending the man over to repair the couch (as originally scheduled). We were to come in and pick out new couches, and they would take the old ones away. So I flew my Dad up on vacation, and took him, Nana, Kerri and us to the furniture store. And after a grueling 8 hour day, where we sat on every single couch in the store at least twice, we finally chose a new set.
This year has been crazy, hectic, and everything in between with many funny stories. Hopefully, 2012 will be even better-- I should go make my New Year's Resolutions now ha ha~
Shifting to other areas, the total global ice mass lost from Greenland, Antarctica and Earth’s glaciers and ice caps was about 4.3 trillion tons (1,000 cubic miles), enough to add 0.5 inches (12 millimeters) to global sea level. That’s enough ice to cover the United States 1.5 feet (0.5 meters) deep. A quarter of the average annual ice loss came from glaciers and ice caps outside of Greenland and Antarctica while ice loss from Greenland and Antarctica averaged 385 billion tons (100 cubic miles) a year.
The waiters will not write down your order, they will get everything right the first time.
And also, what are your favourite colour combinations to use?
Gary had a 7pm meeting, so we had a simple dinner. Eggs, homefries and toast.
I always dread this time of year, when the holiday movies are trotted out. You can't turn around without hearing some jackass bitch about how much he hates It's a Wonderful Life. He can't get enough of "I am your father, Luke" or "I'm King o' the World!", but Zuzu's petals once a year is just more than he can bear.
The first thing we did was remove the border and wash the walls. Then we began priming everything - ceiling, walls, and trim. Then we painted the ceiling and walls in Valspar Gravity. One coat covered well. I was so happy! I still have the trim to paint and the doors to prime and paint. Here is a sneak peek of what it's looking like:
There has not been time yet for our Leather-embossing, Repousse and Woodcarving to work their way, but Book-binding, Cardboard-Sloyd and Basket-making seem to have succeeded very well. ..of Basket-making. Children soon begin to invent their own patterns, and if along with pretty designs we get careful and accurate work the educational value of these employments soon shows itself. I would love to promise a post on boy's handicrafts...but I cannot promise! Life is a whirlwind and I write upon inspiration. So God bless and be an inspired mom for your children.
Classification of hop varieties is complicated by the fact that hops were often sold on the basis of where they were grown, as East Kent Goldings still are today irrespective of which Golding variety they are.
The Pfaff machine? I could probably dedicate a whole blog to my Pfaff machine. My parents bought it when I started my GCSE Textiles at 14 (yep, I am qualified to make a bag!), and when I left home, they gave the machine to me.
Turning to her daughter, she asked, "Tell me what do you see?"
he taps his blinding boots.
Where there is despair, hope;
He watched her on the camera that was set up next to the bed. He could see the desperation in her posture as he turned up the speed on his remote. He knew she wouldn't be able to touch herself in the right fashion to get off but wouldn't get enough stimulation from the vibrator alone. Focusing the camera closer to her face he could see small beads of perspiration forming at her brow and her hands were rubbing against herself but by the frustrated look on her face he could tell it was not working well for her.
The cast of Revenge are absolutely thrilled to hear the news. They posted their feelings on Twitter. Emily VanCamp said: “Season 2 pick up For #REVENGE ! Couldn’t be happier. Thanks ABC ” and Gadriel Mann said: “Huge S2 @revenge #ff @ the fandom. We wouldn’t b back w/o u) endless thanks. My year is now officially made. #GetSome”
Tyson clearly conflates (perhaps deliberately) “atheism” with active atheism: that brand of disbelief that organizes movements, writes antireligious books, and prosyletizes. And Tyson, as he says (somewhat self-servingly), is simply too busy to do that—he’s more interested in bringing people to science. That’s a great thing to do, and Tyson does it superbly, but this explanation leaves a bad taste in my mouth. I’m not going to tell people what they should call themselves, nor do I require Tyson to be an active atheist, but if it walks like a duck and quacks like a duck . .
Lovely as it was for Michelle to be so serene, she was supposed to be in labour.
I am so sorry, I am late.
It only took two years for the two not to even speak to one another anymore. People lose contact all the time, but he always thought she was his soul mate. The two were meant to be together and because of that he knew that they would meet again.
Today the small business is not even 2 years old and yet it feels so right. Alex thinks about how to get by with hardly any inputs in order to maximise what he gets out. Its all organic and worked by hand, because he sees his apple orchard neighbour up the road spending his days sitting on a tractor, dressed in plastic from head to toe and breathing through a massive mask and Alex says that is not for him.
Any good agent knows the business inside out. They know which publishers are looking for what to fill their catalogue, and they can get to talk to people that we mere mortals wouldn't have a hope of contacting. Much more than that, a good agent should be a friend that you can talk to when things aren't going as planned. Agents are part schmoozer, part Rottweiler, part agony aunt, and in my opinion, wholly essential.
So I am giving this man one last chance, because I think any marriage deserves this, and any human deserves this. He is signed up for his own counseling to deal with whatever issues and internal anger he has. We will go to marriage counseling together. He will continue to live with us as long the peace remains. I will attempt to help him become a better man. I will listen to him. I can do this for him. I can lend him some of my new-found strength to lead him on the path to self-love and actualization.
So six months without seeing the dress and no taksies-backsies can make a gal go a little silly.
recipe that’s more to your liking. Whatever you choose, if you stick to these kinds of foods you’ll be getting a bigger bang for your buck. You don’t need to become a vegetarian, but it pays to think like one sometimes.
Grayden had his two month check up at the Pediatrician's office yesterday and is officially weighing in at 9lbs 2oz. He is two ounces shy of Zander's birth weight. The check up went great and all things continue to be going as well as they can be. He is growing and developing well. We also had an appointment with the Urologist here in town. He did a quick exam and talked with me briefly about the "plan" for follow up. Due to the study protocol Grayden will have a bladder and kidney ultrasound done when he is four months old and then every three months following. I felt very comfortable with the Urologist and he is one of the first physicians we have worked with who seems to know a lot about the Moms Trial. He even attended a presentation last year given by one of the Urologist at Vanderbilt that is working with the study. I was hesitant about my appointment with him because he is new in town and most of the other kids we know with Spina Bifida see the other Urologist (who we have heard good things about); but I ended up being pleasantly surprised!
LUNCH: is usually a late snacky type meal for me…so let’s go with the light smoothie here…silken tofu , coconut ( or almond milk) half a banana, and a wee bit of pineapple …tropical lunch ? Yes please… and now…
Again and again in interviews, I've listed your books and career as one of my main influences, but I never actually told you directly. So here goes. When I was a young, evil child, I read your books again and again. I'm pretty sure I stumbled on Charmed Life and The Lives of Christopher Chant first, during my years living in between the shelves of my public library. Then Archer's Goon and The Ogre Downstairs, checked out again and again. Then I hit on Fire and Hemlock, which I didn't like the first time, partially because I was too young and partially because my sister loved it, and there was no way I was going to be caught dead loving something that she loved. She must feel so vindicated now that I've finally agreed to love it.
Its raining here today and I couldn't think why for the life of me my foot felt "wet" when I was dropping Aiden off at school..........hmmmmmm now I know!!
Then, using a basic running stitch, sew the ruffle onto the pant leg.
I’ve never regretted smoking that last cigarette. And I can breathe without wheezing. And the best part: I’m still alive!
$20.75, plus shipping.
It really is quite cool how the uninterrupted take format can make you feel. It’s like you’re in a first-person kind of nightmare, you feel every sense of panic Sarah feels, you have the urge to do the things she does in her situation because you’re put in her shoes and the fact that there are no evident cuts in the action doesn’t allow for you to check back to reality all that easily. And it really is pretty cool how Mr. Kentis and Ms. Lau have used this technique; it opens with an overhead crane shot above the lake shore that then goes down the road, into a house, and follows Sarah all over it, and it really does look like it was done in one single take. That, and how they switch perspectives from point-of-view to following shots, add a lot of little tricks to their arsenal and really make this a rather fascinating watch.
Robert Parry broke many of the Iran-Contra stories in the 1980s for the Associated Press and Newsweek. His latest book, Neck Deep: The Disastrous Presidency of George W. Bush, was written with two of his sons, Sam and Nat, and can be ordered at neckdeepbook.com. His two previous books, Secrecy & Privilege: The Rise of the Bush Dynasty from Watergate to Iraq and Lost History: Contras, Cocaine, the Press & ‘Project Truth’ are also available there. Or go to Amazon.com.
They say she's a chooser, but I just can't refuse her
Hastings Fire Alaska
Drivers education has been an experience. The first few days were great and Alexander seemed to be learning a lot. He gained all the information needed to take the exam for his permit and passed without any problems.
+Yes My Brother (You've Gotta Turn Yourself Around)
Knit One: I’ve been working on my shrug for the wedding, but have decided to take a break from it. I kept getting all nervous, which has a lot of factors, mostly weddings are stressful. All your hopes and fears and dreams and demons get wrapped up into one day. I decided that worrying that much about one piece of clothing was a bit silly.I got super close to finishing it. 25 rows away. I’ll try again this weekend and see if it goes better.
Families were given a passport during our large group worship service and then they went to 3 stations on campus before going off campus to buy a gift for someone in need and coming back on campus to wrap it / pray over it / and then enjoy some hot cocoa. It was an Epic night.
A beer factory was operating, however, and the visitor pronounced the Taedong River beer, a local brand, “very drinkable.”
Many among the mega-rich reliably attempt to control the legal process for their own benefit. There are far more than enough American rich who routinely try to subvert democracy in this way. Our laws prevent classical extractive plutocracy, but the rich can still systematically influence government, and they do. With focused organizations of systematic exploitation like ALEC, their influence has become grossly distorted, so much so that the detrimental effect on others has become obvious. This differs from extractive plutocracy only in degree.
02 Silent passability (ride to the countryside)
I’m trying to come in on the safe side, chickens.
I was in my third year of undergrad, with an enormous crush on one of my professors.
Your tip this month – At all costs, avoid anyone called Mark or Mary.
Unlike the pastel multi-petalled English roses in my garden, these roses were bold and brash hybrid teas. These are not subtle roses; the blooms are huge, and the colours are vivid and richly saturated. One golden yellow rose was named Strike It Rich – appropriate for a state whose fortunes were transformed by the discovery of “black gold.” Houston is not really a subtle town. Hermann Park may be a green oasis in its center, but the city is ringed by miles of vast motorways and the cars are all huge. You can’t help but notice that the place is fiercely devoted to consumerism. The first thing we do when we get to Houston is eat Mexican food. The second thing? Go shopping.
One more thing: You're probably wondering which one is "Lothar". The answer: None of them. Lothar was the THEREMIN who fronted the band. Duh.
The spirit of the Belli challenges is to encourage you to use your OLD and FORGOTTEN embellishments! Everyone is welcome to play along! Challenge a stamping friend! Just follow the theme and add your direct link to our inlinkz widget below.
As I read through this story I noticed that people kind of blamed Jesus for Lazarus’ death. Verses 21, 32, and 37 all seem to point in the same general direction: Jesus could have done something but since he wasn’t there he didn’t. I’ll bet they would be angry if they knew he purposely stayed behind for two extra days.
I have never made or sent an Easter Card before, but I received one from my Dad's cousin so I decided to make one to send back to her. I have recently made contact with Barbara because of our mutual interest in family history.
an upward and irreversible turn.
Forgetting to book children onto Any Courses.
#3- Big Labor/Triple R (D)
some Mother's Day gifts, so don't
I’ve seen new recruits fly by me on the fast track to success, but does anybody stop to help the guy broken down on the side of that track?
I was attending the senior/parent college night at my daughter's high school,
Ever since the days of sound, music on the screen has occupied an important, if sometimes overlooked position. From the early times when the soundtrack overwhelmed the audience to the present, when the music has become an integral part of screen entertainment, musicians of all kinds have composed scores for the movies. Sometimes the musicians were men of the stature of Aaron Copland, virgil Thomson and similar composers, at other times they were simply songwriters hired to string together some borrowings from classical composers. It is only lately that the screen has developed its own group of musicians, men who have studied the art of the film as well as the art of music, and who have brought new concepts into their writing for movies. These men have written dramatic and exciting scores, and at the same time have not neglected the melodic themes that spill over into popular music.
The price is not yet determined, nor does RIM share any details on which U.S. carrier will introduce the Bold (though AT&T seems to be the most likely). However, there's no single-carrier commitment like the iPhone. The Blackberry Bold is supposed to hit the market in Summer 2008, possibly around the same time frame as iPhone-2 (around June). So if you've been waiting for buying a cool, sleek new device, it might be a good idea to compare the two and see which one fits your needs! While iPhone continues to be a choice for video and multimedia features with its large display and attractive touchscreen, the Blackberry Bold could be a competitive option for business and enterprise needs.
Through body-based therapy, meditation, journal work, and much attention to my own moment-by-moment experience, I have found a better place for enough in my life. I now make it a daily practice around eating, sitting in meditation, and in my work to ask myself if this is enough. I have developed a couple of mantras that help, too.
Who am I missing?
Let’s first have a look at Power Distance (PDI). There’s a marked different between the two countries. Australia has quite low power distance, meaning that we tend to see everyone as being equal no matter how much power they actually hold. Japan, on the other hand, has a moderate score, meaning that while they are very much aware of their place in the hierarchy of society, they also still hold the belief that anyone can do anything if they work hard enough.
Now, I've known most of these women for awhile and I know damn well they don't know what to make of me and this whole unschooling thing. But this is the midwest, and people here are generally polite. Which means they nod in all the right places, and wait until you leave the room to say what they really think.
05. On my mind feat. Lentle Kay (prod. by Carnyiso)
The pulling began shortly after I stopped chemically straightening my hair, about fifteen years ago. For about year during that time, I grew out my natural hair and returned to a relaxer. Never once during that period did I pull my hair. Unfortunately, I also didn't run or engage in any strenuous exercise that would undo my expensive hairstyle and since I'm more concerned with my physical health than smooth straight hair, I cut off the straightener and went back to my natural kinks, and to pulling.
Secondly, I want to present you with a great song by Third Day in keeping with our Who You Are in Christ theme. I have talked about grace before and how it can be difficult to understand and accept, sometimes nearly impossible; nonetheless, it is crucial to do so. It is absolutely essential to living a successful, victorious, and effective Christian life. Grace is key. So without further ado, I hope this impacts you.
We are so incredibly grateful to all of our friends and family for all of your support and continued support.
I had two toddlers, and this caught my interest. Looking into it, I learned that small children swallow a considerable quantity of toothpaste when they brush, perhaps most of it.
WE ARE BLESSED
Do you hate trying to find the right style of sunglasses for your face? Try aviator sunglasses-which truly are timeless and look good on all men and women. Here are some examples of aviators worn through the years.
Guess how much.
it made perfect sense, that as he watched the Rocker dogs scatter after his friends, it was just the leather jacketed body of Chav Harry which sped out towards himself!
'Twas the Night Before Christmas ... ABC Family ... 10 AM
Such information is old hat to all who recall using clotheslines. Now, let’s get down to the real significance and psychology of this utilitarian device. First, the construction and condition of the clothesline offers clues to the pride of the owner and especially the powers of the “little woman” within the family. A well-constructed clothesline usually meant the wife had great persuasive qualities with her husband.
10. Sabre Dance 4'44
Manawatu – Wanganui 63.3% to 61.6% (115,800 to 112,500)
I've found that WalMart has great prices on all materials required for this project. Of course, you can get as fancy as you like by going to specialty fabric stores. Here's what you'll need.
doesn’t really solve much at all.
Baby sister is growing as well!! At her two month appt, she weighed 13 pounds even (up from 8 lbs, 3 ozs at her 2 week check). She looks a LOT bigger from one to two months. She is sleeping great. Last week she slept 5 nights in a row (10-12 hours without a feeding). She went from waking twice to not at all. On the sixth day, she got a cold, and didn't sleep great for a couple nights, but she's working back to it! I really can't complain.
IT'S A GIRL!!!
So here I am inNew York, reaping the benefits of self inquiry. The biggest lesson I have learned so far over here is to reach out to others. That I am not supposed to do everything alone. My hardened independence, once seen as an asset, was stripped down to its raw underlying bones and the painful truth that my ‘independence’ is fear-driven. Fear that no one will be out there for me, fear that if they are, they will let me down or abandon me. My controlling nature has given me the cosseted belief that only I can do it right. Whatever it may be. Letting go of the control is an ongoing process that is anxiety provoking but the letting go of old patterns and behaviours has allowed me to connect, in such a beautiful way, with others. The hardest thing has been to sit in vulnerability. Being vulnerable is not an easy thing to be. Like a newly-born chick, all wobbly and fearful, I am sliding through the gunk, sometimes sitting in it, even rolling around in it, but I am eventually finding my wings. Spreading them out and learning to fly. But I am not alone and this is the crux. I am reaching out to others. Making the first few phone calls to people here has been excruciatingly difficult. Shyness. Embarrassment. Shame. Fear of rejection. Not wanting to admit loneliness. But I did reach out. And I have kept reaching out.
Two of my favorite authors of all time--and who knew one was a huge fan of the other? Great stuff on copyright, novels, fiction and more.... Thanks to Story of the Week from The Library of America for An Interview with Mark Twain.
1 years experience in SharePoint administration in a production environment
This is about ‘Protection of Children from Sexual Offence Bill (2011)’. This bill has already been approved by the Cabinet and now has been sent to the Rajya Sabha for the final debate. If passed it will become a Law. A law that makes sex below 18 years of age a punishable crime. And this law will be applicable to both, boys and girls. When it was first tabled it had a provision for consensual sexual activity between the ages of 16 and 18, but now that has been dropped, criminalizing teenage sex. The motive of this Law is supposedly to prevent sexual exploitation or abuse of minors. But come to think of it, will it really do that? I’m not an expert in Law nor do I understand much about law making. What I say here are my thoughts as a lay person who reads the daily newspaper.
There are a number of companies that offer Honeymoon Registries where guests can buy you meals and activities (tours, shows, spa treatments, etc.) at your honeymoon destination. Each program is different so I suggest doing some research on several companies before deciding which one to register at.
For those who haven't been following along recently, we have been paying tribute to the revolutionaries and protesters who are currently fighting for their freedom across the North African and Middle Eastern regions. Since my last protest, new protests and violent clashes have broken out in Bahrain, Libya and Iran. This is turning out to be a very historic month, the likes of which have not been seen since the Velvet Revolution which occurred in 1989. Although only two countries have managed to successfully overthrow their regimes up till this point, while BLAHBLAH BLAH managed to throw successful revolutions in 1989. It remains to be seen if these countries will be able to reach their end-goal, which is regime change. Political analysts were saying that an Egyptian revolution was next to impossible, due to the social and political conditions being dramatically different than those which led to the revolution in Tunisia. I find it unlikely that the regimes in some of these countries will fall. However, I am not only paying tribute to those who are most likely to succeed in their revolutionary goals. It takes a great deal of courage to stand up to an oppressive regime willing to use force against peaceful protesters, especially those who have the least support behind them, and realize that their chances are slim. I want those who are participating in these protests to know that I have a great deal of respect for their courage and dedication to strengething the moral and political infrastructure of their country. Not only do you have my support, but countless others around the world are closely watching the events unfolding in your respective countries, praying for your safety and hoping you will succeed. Although we cannot be there physically, we are with you in spirit.
Working with a stand mixer, preferably fitted with a paddle attachment, or with a hand mixer in a large bowl, beat the butter and sugar on medium speed, scraping the bowl as needed, for 3 minutes, or until the mixture is smooth, thick and pale. Add the eggs one at a time, beating for about 1 minute after each addition; you’ll have a light, fluffy batter. Reduce the mixer speed to low and beat in the apple butter – don’t worry if it curdles the batter. Still on low, add the grated apples and mix to completely blend. Add the dry ingredients, mixing only until they disappear into the batter. Using a rubber spatula, fold in the nuts and raisins/cranberries. Turn the batter into the Bundt pan and smooth the top of the batter with the rubber spatula.
I have been painting, although sporadically over this nasty winter. Painting sun-drenched beach scenes refresh the soul in February.
GARDEN
WIE: In your book The Self-Aware Universe you speak about the need for a paradigm shift. Could you talk a bit about how you conceive of that shift? From what to what?
Do you see it? Hint: Have you ever watched a bird hatch, or closely examined the egg debris that fell out of a robin’s nest? Noticed how the baby breaks the egg into one large piece and one smaller piece? Sooo… if you have six pieces… then you have the remains of (6 divided by 2 equals…) 3 eggs. 6-4=what again? So.
On my sojourns through God's Kingdom lately, the landscape is littered with peeling, weather-beaten campaign signs. I try to get away from it and go deeper, farther and leave it behind where the neighboring mountains appear grey-green at the base, a lighter green-grey behind it and a higher, pale lavender grey-green ridge in the far distance. Mist rises from the base of the far lavender ridge graduating to deeper grey at the top where it meets the clouds. The mist means fog is coming on which means summer is over, winter opened its window and frost lies on the ground at dawn. Its just a quick slide into wood gathering, stacking, hauling into the fireplace from there, although we never got started so early before. I keep my eye on it. First snow is always on Thanksgiving, but this year it could happen any day. The Elk began bugling at the end of August. That never happened so early before either. Actually, this is a wonderful thing because the cold, wet night air (humidity) limits the probability of wildfires. Lastly, as was the case in 2009, the Juncos are late by many weeks. The weather conditions must be just right for them to make the journey south and apparently, it is not. I think in my mind its the air quality. The belching filth of big agra is easily mistaken for fog coming through the passes. Indeed, it is that surreal. It was not always that way. I remember. I made notes in my Smithsonian guides.
9: Baby Jane Hudson invites you over to her house for lunch. What do you bring?
One presentation was all about trees in our area and my children and other children acted out parts of a tree. Very interesting and fun! :)
It is this same safe guard during the Cultural Movement of the 1960s and 70s, that prevented people like The Beatles, Jim Morrison and the Doors, and everyone else during that period from truly climbing higher spiritually, and. Instead led many of them to abusing substances, social disorder and the committing all sorts of heinous acts despite their original natural and peaceful intentions.
My favorite part was rocking and singing them to sleep! What beautiful and sweet little people they are.
LaShawn – That he’s an honest guy, a hard worker, and that I go out and train hard so that when I line up I can be dominant. That’s the equation. To put in the hard work so that when the lights are on you can go out and get what needs to be done, done. You train hard for that 43 seconds you race, so I just go out and get it done.
26. Desolato Sconforto (01:07)
I know a lot of people are excited about election day... and I'm excited about it for an entirely different reason. I finally get my life back. I don't have to stay at work until 9 at night because someone wanted to change their advertising and we're waiting for the commercial. I don't have to wear makeup to work every day in case I have to record a politicians commercial. (The one day I DIDN'T wear makeup to work last week... I had to record a guy. He was nice though. And worked REAL HARD for my vote!)
Special thanks to Justin for sharing with us his very eclectic taste in music indeed! Don't forget to head off to Wondrous Reads tomorrow for the next stop in the Immortal War Blog Tour!
Another change I made (but probably shouldn’t have) was reduce the sugar and fat in the recipe by just a little. While this did make my granola bars a smidge healthier, it also made them a good bit crumblier.
Anywho, back to my cat. We left him home because he's a cat, even if he thinks he's a better human than me. He had food and water and other cats to torment, but he didn't have us--no people to pour his fat little self milk. No humans to open the door when he meowed. No family to cuddle with. None. So now that we are back, he's ticked. Okay, really ticked.
Umm, well I play guitar and shout a lot, Zach plays bass and also shouts a lot, Scotty plays guitar and shouts on at least one occasion, and Gaz plays drums and just stays quiet for a large majority of the time.
In order to uncover the fascinating, forgotten story of ‘The Impaler’, Trow looks into the history, legend and lore of his legacy. Compellingly and historically, he shows how the legend of the vampire has evolved over centuries and explains how it still has such an intense hold on modern day imagination.
Charlotte Rampling, Under the Sand
Anthropologists generally agree that hominids, humans, evolved as we did due to our ability to make tools, the development of language, and, Dr. Shipman says, the way we not only hunted animals for food, but the way we domesticated them, eventually to the point where some became members of the family.
The liquid inside is NOT transparent however, it is milk, so it needs to remain white. To keep it white and to make sure you know it is not the glass jar I shadowed the liquid with my cool grays. I did this both to the milk on the floor as well as the bottle. With a white background the milk looks a little dark, but remember, our background will be dark, so having the milk kind of dark is OK.
Bob Kuban and the In-Men watched in 1966 as their hit song “ The Cheater” raced up the charts. The music trade papers designate any song rapidly climbing the top hundred singles chart with a bullet next to the entry, to show that it’s moving fast. Even though “The Cheater” was number one in St. Louis, the highest it ever reached on the national chart was number 12. Walter Scott sang the words—“Look out for the cheater,” every night he performed live for the last 17 years of his life. Ironically, Walter was killed by a bullet from a gun at close range, the circumstantial evidence overwhelmingly pointing to the involvement of his wife’s lover Jim Williams. After a lengthy trial, conviction and appeal, Jim Williams was finally sentenced in 1992 for the capital murders of Sharon Williams and Walter Scott. JoAnn wound up serving 18 months on a five year felony charge—for making false statements and hindering the prosecution—before being released in 1994. Jim Williams is currently serving a life sentence with no chance of parole at the Potosi Correctional Institution in Missouri.
Osip Mandelstam was perhaps the most singular of all the geniuses who flourished amidst the chaos of revolutionary Russia. Raised in St Petersburg by Jewish parents, he was one of the young modernists who sought to revolutionise Russian poetry in the first two decades of the twentieth century, by replacing the over-elaborate language and cliched imagery of nineteenth century trends like Romanticism and Symbolism with work that was both crisply phrased and elliptical. From the start of his career, though, Mandelstam had a fiercely idiosyncratic understanding of the modernist mission.
When Pennywell was about 10 years old, around 1919, his father died. Pennywell became a ward of his uncle William Folsom and moved to Lowndes County (then Irwin County.)
PostgreSQL is used for data storage which is a popular object-relational database management system (ORDBMS). PostGIS7 is an extension which adds support for geographic objects to the PostgreSQL. PostGIS “spatially enables” the PostgreSQL to be used as a backend spatial database for geographic information systems (GIS). This is similar to ESRI’s SDE or Oracle’s spatial extension. PostGIS follows the OpenGIS “Simple Features Specification for SQL” and certified as compliant with the “Types and Functions” profile.
When asked why she decided to do Lip Sync, Freshman photography major Annie Wald responded, “Because I love to dance and I wanted to spend time with my Theta girls.”
Ink - Ranger Distress Ink - Barn Door, Dusty Concord, Memento Black
# ISBN-13: 978-1409521372Once more we approach a Wuthering Heights adaptation for young readers. It's not only because it is a new book and we try to cover as much as we can of what is published on and about the Brontës. It's also because we think it is important. The measure of the perdurability of what we consider a classic is as much indebted to how it permeates contemporary culture as to how it is able to transcend age barriers as well. It is remarkable how some particular books manage it: Dickens's Oliver Twist (and in some measure Great Expectations or David Copperfield), Austen's Pride and Prejudice or Emma or, of course, Charlotte Brontë's Jane Eyre and Emily Brontë's Wuthering Heights. The latter is particularly bizarre as Heathcliff and Catherine's love story can be all but children material. How to make the material appealing for children and at the same not betray the original is a very difficult task.
Still, if you find yourself being tackled to your kitchen floor by an armed assailant in a knitted reindeer jumper, you’ll need to think about which emergency number you need to ring. While blood trickles from your atrophied organs, slowly drowning you in your own vital fluids, take a moment and think to yourself “does this really warrant a 999 call?” If not, you might like to try 111, the new number for emergencies that aren’t quite that urgent.
She's still got the leather.
For those at Pentecost the answer was to repent and be baptised according to Acts 2:38. But for the Philippian gaoler it was to believe on the Lord Jesus Christ and be saved. That is the gospel of God’s grace.
All the best to all of you for a week of tall tales.
Shadow Vault (PC)
how this all happens
Here is my Recipe for baked gujiya
Æla
Could Najib be involved in some financial transaction or other? Basel is quite a strategic city for any lawyer to be in. For example, Najib’s own lawyer can attend the court in Paris and then go to the Swiss banks to check on his client’s accounts - maybe even to get some hard cash to defray some of his expenses.
1 sensibilities
They are lovely objects nonetheless though.
Yesterday afternoon, my husband came home from work a little early and we had a disagreement. It was just a quick back and forth of how we both felt about the situation, and then it was over with. No yelling... but we certainly had on our "angry tone" voices.
Preferably snuggled spooned in your arms at night. You wanted what’s on my heart, you got it, baby.
The bus ride into the city was... memorable. There were about 12 of us on the bus, and I would wager that at least 7 were feeling sick. Lo and behold, the sickness erupted into a beautiful scene of people vomiting out the windows. Only two actually did the deed, but I was clutching my Klean Kanteen for dear life, closing my eyes, and taking deep breaths in an attempt to ease my very angry stomach.
'Tween pavement and stars is the chimney sweep world
Oh, and I just saw that Mary-Anne’s on pinterest. Cool.
“When plunder becomes a way of life for a group of men living together in society, they create for themselves in the course of time, a legal system that authorizes it and a moral code that glorifies it.” – Frederic Bastiat – (1801-1850) in Economic Sophisms
I say, to myself or to those around me, as I grab for my third brownie, I am a food addict. As in, it’s ok that I am eating this brownie because as a food addict, I can’t control myself. You shouldn’t judge me because this is a disease that I can’t control.
So, that is what I am chewing on tonight.....just trying to negotiate my life....whew!
married: 3/5/1874
A few years ago, I found the coolest umbrella at The Museum of Modern Art (here) I bought it, enjoyed using it, and then bought a dozen more of them which I gave to close friends for Christmas gifts. A picture of this fun object is above.
Donald H. Gregory, 62, Ramsey, N.J.
the sound of summer silence
Buffy wiggles into the conversation for a sense of the familiar, intermingled with a delightful tangent in social service wordplay, and we finish off heavy with the ethics of piracy. LISTEN YOU SOME.
After all she was my first A to Z sign-up in 2010
Feb 22
Which seems to be the source used by Sturtevant at least. It is not inconceivable that a Huguenot priest would make such an allusion. (Venus is not usually a gardener, though she says through Ovid that she picked some “golden apples” — whether these are oranges or quinces is another topic — from her island of Cyprus for Hippomenes to use to distract Atalanta.) But there does not seem to be any such passage in his published work. At least I have not found it in any of the French editions of the Histoire or the Latin translation. Versions even show up in French works, often in guillemets, but apparently as translations from Lindley's English. Before that, it appears in Floriculture Magazine (1840), where it's Jean de Leary. And the remaining sources are the works of Charles McIntosh: Book of the Garden (1855), The Orchard (1839), The Practical Gardener (1828). The earliest even says, “in the inflated style of those early times,” which certainly suggests that he found the quotation in an older source. If it were before 1716, there might be some mention in Lochner's extensive Commentatio de Ananasa sive nuce Pinea indica Vulgo Pinas (online). And nothing similar is in EEBO or ECCO. So I do not know where it came from (and would welcome suggestions).
Let's hear about his very first mission!
3) Howl - Full of Hell
I had a very healthy imagination and high aspirations for myself seeing that I am not athletically, musically or artistically inclined. But dreams are dreams and I did eventually win a pretty gold ribbon at my grade 7 science fair.
So tell me what you think, are you pears whipping up on us apples?
Glad to be hearing those words, mostly because I’ve been wanting Insanity for months. But I’m so glad I finally got it. Anyways, I started Insanity yesterday with the fit test. And this is what I got for numbers:
He would walk through and then close it behind himself like it was no big deal.
Further along in the story, the narrator observes M. Swann during a lapse into past jealousies.
-bloomsbury
This approach really came to light recently when I had some friend round for afternoon tea and they are not crafty or scrapbookers but they know about my hobby. They asked to see an album, and I was able to pick up my 2011 part 2 album - and they were able to look through it and it made sense. Your saw the seasons change, your saw M grow up and you saw August change to December. Granted there is still lots of things I need to add to my albums (for example a specific Christmas page for 2011) but I am totally OK with this. I am going to take on board the points Shimelle makes and I am looking forward to - looking through my album and working out what stories or photos or pages I want to add to make that story complete.
The way in which numerous of us purchase footwear has been transformed in current years. The rise of web footwear retailers has meant that you will find now decrease costs on provide than we may previously imagined.
This was taken from by a talk by Deiter F. Uchtdorf ; October 2011. You can watch this fabulous talk HERE.
I use this blog a lot as an outlet for what sucks in my life :) So with Thanksgiving (my FAVORITE Holiday BTW) Upon us this month, I have decided to look at what I am truly thankful for. A lot of these will be pic heavy for those who like pics :)
Sometimes I wonder, is it me or is it them? I mean, am I the one off my rocker or is it me against the world? Or at least me against the world of home decorating.
Last but not least if you want to read more about where the Gugelhupf comes from and get a lovely recipe for a savoury bacon and onion Gugelhupf click here!
Roll pie crust on a lightly floured surface.
Justin comes over to personally tell us about the sixth course -- the Forgotten Vegetables -- and it's clear this one is close to his heart. This dish reminds me of my childhood, Justin says, and there's a tone of wistfulness in his voice.
So, the day the moving truck left Akron our house was on the property. It was not entirely put together. There was no electric, no water, and no septic. The truck had to go back so all of our stuff was unloaded into the living room. The only thing to do was to stay with my parents until we could get the house in living condition. Tim and I, three kids seven and under, with my parents, in a single wide trailer, in a trailer park. Good times. Good times.
The teenagers have to something which is tough for them first, they have maintain their driving record clearly without any complaints otherwise they have to pay high premium. The teenager car insurance premium rate is based on their car type, if the car is highly latest model or sport car, then the charges are also so high. If you have second hand car, then you can pay least premium better the parents can buy the second car that helps to save their money. This teenager car insurance is suitable for student drivers who are excellent in driving and also brilliant in their studies particularly having gratitude getting prizes in their educational institution.
I never got to meet her, but she did sit in front of The Man and me seven or eight years ago at a movie at the old Village Cinema, before it became the Alamo Drafthouse. (You couldn't mistake that bouffant, and it was right in front of me. Oh, there were plenty of open seats, and I could have moved, but I felt strangely honored - and tickled - to have my vision obstructed by her big hair.)
(Actually, the artist is quoted to have said he wanted to introduce a dark element to the pure beauty of the near-perfect blooms.)
07. No Vacancy (KANT KINO remix)
I ended up with a degree in German.. took a job working as a translator on a cruise line..
Video: Obama’s Actions On Israel Worry Democrats Israel requested bigger bunker busters from US Video: Why Does UN Rights Council Turns Blind Eye to Terror? Israel abandoning Har HaZeitim (Mount of Olives)? 20,000 women escaped the Holocaust by working as maids in England
Crafty Scrapper that my DH was not happy with :o)
It is much like person to person communication. I can sit down and talk to you and may have something interesting and important to say but if you don't like my tone or my facial expressions or the way I constantly smack my lips while speaking or never make eye contact or talk with my mouth full then it's not likely you'll want to listen to me for very long.
7 Annex “B” of Petitions; Id., 43-44.
Next time I make pudding cake, I promise I’ll show you how to make it. Until then, feel free to lick your computer screens.
In his book Russian Literature: 1995-2002 – On the Threshold of a New Millennium N.N. Shneidman writes:
Direct Speech
Except one.
And do you know what else? It reminds me why I love being part of the blogosphere. How privileged am I to meet all of you amazing people and to share in your adventures as we make our way down this crazy and otherwise lonely road we call WRITING?
As for marketing myself? I did not know that the onus would be on me to do any of that. I thought the publicity people at the publishers took care of sales and marketing. Duh!
To wit, I don't believe an invisible spirit sits on your shoulder and logs good and bad deeds into a ledger, and then conjures whatever vicissitudes necessary to balance the account. Nor do I believe a supreme being watches from the heveans, rewarding kindness and punishing evil. These are beautiful ideas and I wish they were true. But faith in karma doesn't withstand empiracle testing.
” The Wall” looked down at his chest, shocked that Nate had managed to move him at all. Then the boy gave a strangled cry. “What did you do?” he yelled.
except ‘The Mole’ (Scottish) who cracks, runs, climbs,
As illustrated above, 10 is by itself so it is 10. Then if we group the numbers so that each group equals ten, we have four additional sets. So all together, we have five groups of ten with five left over which equals 55. 5 x 10 = 50 + 5 = 55.
Imagine my surprise when two days later I got the call offering me the job. I also got an apology. Zora said they had given me the worst merchandise and a defunct end cap with no direction (and they knew I was an office person not a retail person). She said what they loved most about my interview is that I told them how much I didn't love what I had done. At least they get my sense of humor I guess. I accepted both her apology and the job. I do like having a job and it's actually a fun job. It's not a forever job but it's a place holder of sorts for me right now. I have been very disciplined and haven't bought stuff left and right (the whole point is to get out of the house and get a paycheck!) but I have bought one thing for myself so far. Real Deals has a design brand of their own called Jackson Harrison and that brand basically knocks off stores like Pottery Barn, Ballard Designs, Crate & Barrel, etc. In fact, it's the same merchandise, made in the same factories but it is priced and finished for various price points.
The Queen's husband, Prince Albert of Saxe-Coburg-Gotha, was also a dog lover, and they were to have many pets about them in their years together. Albert's Dash was a greyhound named Eos, which he brought with him from Germany when he and Victoria married, and who figures in many pictures. That's him at right with Prince Albert and young Vicky, the Princess Royal.
STYLE WARS is regarded as the indispensable document of New York Street culture and subway graffiti art of the early '80s, It is a record of a golden age of youthful creativity that exploded into the world from a city in crisis. http://www.stylewars.com/
5.) No Time is Too Late to Fight
For Brabant, parenting is the first and greatest citizen act, and doing it well is already a great commitment to society.
Secondly, and, less formally, I've been thinking of administratorship on the English Wikipedia for a while now. I've been offered a nomination man-ny, man-ny times, from the_ed17, Blooded Edge, Juliancolton, J.delanoy, MathCool10, and Goodmorningworld, among others. And, every time, I've turned it down. But the more I hear others asking me about it, the more it becomes a digestible idea. Why not run and see what happens?
Thanks for your visit our website. Considering looking for Beltronics Vector V955 Radar Detector? This blog is the review products for you. The Beltronics Vector V955 Radar Detector is the best one for you.
It really is apparent there are many of boats which have been built which have no right in attempting telephone long distance offshore voyages. And obviously that a majority of manufactures will not build these vessels your intent. Truth being, offshore boats are not mainstream volume of their market and for that reason why must they address that kind of your build? Subsequently each of these vessels are only just not around the work available. That task naturally is long lasting ocean crossings. That was not to state they haven’t ever done it. The thing is influenced by many factors. The integrity from the yacht in the first place, from your hull laminate structure, keel bolts, along with the mast and rigging, towards the weather windows that any particular boat and crew has brought open to start a long crossing in.
Minister comes last in the list. Yes that is right GOD comes last! Do they really think this is okay with God? I think not. Go read about what he said about this in the Bible. He is first and last he will stay first and last..no matter what.
13. Unexpected happenings that I'll be able to Slice about!
A trust spokeswoman said it could be because pupils just chose a salad or a dessert rather than a full meal.
“There were no charges against the dog,” he quipped.
So, I went around with Raid, trying to kill every last fly I could find. I think I ingested some of that rotten bug killer.
I have plans for a matching headband but with the craziness of the week that didn't get done so I'll get that put together and share how I do it (if it works out) because it's going to be a new one for me.
Hi! My name is Jacqueline and I’m an aspiring writer from Hong Kong. In my life, I’ve always dreamt to be many things. Before I realized my passion for writing, I remember wanting to become an actress. However, I didn’t get much support for this, being that it wasn’t a realistic enough goal. It hurt me… it truly did. So I decided to opt for law; that was back when I was at the young age of 16. I was taking an introductory law course back then and received good grades, so I thought I had my future set for me then and there. Fast forwards to two years later, I decided to join the Writing Club at my high school, thanks to the encouragement of my English teacher. I had my own column and was in-charge of covering school events. One thing led to another and guess who soon promoted to Managing Editor? I realized then that I was happier writing and I was determined to work for a magazine in future, work my way up and start my own columns. But after high school, I stopped writing…
Now let’s warm ourselves by the artLedge...
time with each other . She tryed buring her face in the pillows from
When Booksmart launches on your PC you are given the option to upload a word document or a series of photographs for inclusion in your book. You decide upon the trim size and format of your book and proceed from there. It is not hard to see that the text/black/white interior option has only recently been added as it has the least layout choices available. Immediately the cover, copyright and title/chapter pages are there, but you can edit these pages to your own specifications. I chose simply to drop and paste the interior of my book in to the pages and play around with the fonts and styles. You effectively get all fonts available in word and the freedom to customise as much as you want or import your documents on to a themed template. What I like most is the flexibility it gives you. Having said that, using the copy and paste method seems to highlight some glitches in the Booksmart software. You have got to be very careful with text ‘justification’, ‘centring’ and in particular, words like ‘don’t’ and ‘martin’s’ where the ‘’s’ can often be separated from the main word and centring and justification can be completely lost. The real headache comes with artwork. Something Blurb should actually be strong with. The cover can be a nightmare if you have not selected the correct format you want with the book. Booksmart does not allow the import of PDF document pages or graphics, so every image has to come in as a bitmap or jpeg, with a 300dpi resolution.
When CPR is combined with an Automated External Defibrillator (AED) the odds of survival shot up to 50 percent.
A few weeks back City Crafter Challenge Blog challenged us to make an ATC, then decided to go a step further and do a swap. I received my goodies in the mail the other day from June in Indiana. Wow! All the goodies she sent me – I just can’t wait to use them.
Here's a quiet five minutes in an otherwise rushed week - time enough to do a long overdue post.
My only resolution for this year is to be accountable to myself. I have been accountable to others for my entire life, and now I need a year of focus on me and my commitments to myself.
JUSTICE KAGAN: But Justice Cardozo certainly didn't limit his holding in the way you suggest. The language of that opinion is extremely broad. And if you read that opinion, no one would gather from that opinion the kinds of limits that you're suggesting on it.
clouds don't feed on don't gleam like ideas,
Martin played a prominent role at the NASUWT conference this weekend, when teachers expressed their anger at Government policy on Academies, pensions and the Secretary of State Michael Gove, and his continual attacks on the teaching profession.
Good morning and welcome back to another Timeless Tuesday challenge.
Request No. 6
The key seems to be journalling WHILE you’re travelling, and I think that’s where my problem is. I always “save” the journalling for later, and then never get around to it. So the next time you’re off on an adventure, no matter how large or small, jot down a few thoughts in the moment. Even if all there is to hand is a napkin; you can always transfer your musings into your regular journal later.
Breaks me like a twig
BONUS QUESTION:
love fiercely,
At this you say “OK, judgment is coming but what does that have to do with Tiller? How could you say based on the New Testament God could possibly have been involved in his death? That judgment is reserved for the end of the days.
articles. Resell them, edit or modify them to create brand
$0.50 off Pillsbury Crescent Dinner Rolls
I got off the phone and cried. WTF??!! I didn't want to go to the ER! I didn't want to leave my six day old baby! I didn't want to take her and expose her to God-knows-what! My husband and I hemmed and hawed on how to handle this crisis. Meanwhile, our baby was crying! She hated the car! We decided to have Phil and the baby stay home, and my mom pick me up and take me to the ER.
SHD: Things were on the decline, bands were breaking up, some good groups started playing for money, the clubs dragged out their disco records, and the worst thing of all was that people in general lost interest.
Sounds like the Jews have been wondering the same thing I have – why NOT just tell them plainly that he’s the Messiah? Why beat around the bush with all the inferences and implications and oblique meanings – he’s told them he’s the Son of Man, that he’s been sent by God, that he’s the shepherd of both the Jews and the gentiles, that he and God are one, but he won’t utter the words “Yes, I’m the Messiah”. Here he says it’s because he wants his actions to speak for themselves. I theorize that he also wanted to avoid being pigeon-holed into the Jews’ erroneous belief that the Messiah would be some kind of Conquering Warrior King.
We have waited so long for this marvelous journey and I have so many emotions built up. I think anxious, nervous, excited, and worried all seem to be good words to describe how I am feeling.
Andrew Motion
with pause for eyes the nose
“As the police dogs and horse will be present at the open day, we do ask that people leave their dogs at home rather than bring them to the event. We would love to see as many people as possible on the day and I invite everyone to come along and have a fabulous, free, day out which I hope will be enjoyable and informative for all.
I wave him a cheery smart-ass salute and waddle my way towards the suspicious vehicle, humming an off-key tune to myself to deaden the tension.
My boys are 1.
I would love to have some fancy wrapping station with tons of space that takes up half my house, but that is just not a reality. In truth, I prefer to have guests and friends, not a wrapping station I will never use. This little set-up is just perfect for all my wrapping needs. I don't have any kids yet, but I have a feeling this will be really handy when all those birthday parties start up (one day).
It’s interesting to me that in the shadow of all that, I’m writing so much now.
with a query critique and/or one hour consultation with her about marketing or anything else. Shelli is a marketing whiz and picking her brain for an hour is certainly a prize to cherish. The contestants will pit their new 500 word sample against each other and leave it to you to decide their fate. You will have all week to decide, so take
All cardstock is from SU. Used my Cuttlebug to emboss the paper and cut out the circles etc. The stamp is from the Baby Boy set from Inkadinkado, stamped it with 3 different Cats Eye colors. I used blue Stickles on the sea and Star Dust stickles on the Yellow paper. The turtles and the ribbon are from my collection.
Those were the six beers I was given, and to be completely honest, if someone gave me them blind I'd have no idea that they were made by someone in their own home. The whole range is of an excellent and truly eye opening quality. This is the closest I've come to trying a homebrew that's fully fit for commercial release, fact.
Your typical personal characteristics are: a strongly subjective, emotional and impulsive approach to life and to everything that attracts your attention; a tendency to be emotionally confused or to reach out eagerly toward some deeply felt compelling goal, to project your feelings upon people and situations, without much regard for what these actually are in themselves.
So I'm going to discuss it more with him but I am considering leaving my position at the end of this school year, if not earlier.
The man shot the bow & arrow and almost hit the boyfriend, somehow the boyfriend & girlfriend did not hear or notice the arrow hit the dock near them, and then the fake DashieXP looking man shot his weapon; but he missed too, and it made a loud noise that caused the boyfriend & girlfriend to realize that someone shot at them and so the fake DashieXP looking man jumped into the water with a life vest on.
bathroom and wash them down or slather hand Sanitizer
Keep trying. One day I’m going to win.
Though we often entertain these thoughts, they are completely useless...unless you have a Delorean and a flux capacitor.
Soon you’re cursing
18The Spirit of the Lord is upon me, because he hath anointed me to preach the gospel to the poor; he hath sent me to heal the brokenhearted, to preach deliverance to the captives, and recovering of sight to the blind, to set at liberty them that are bruised,
So I was joking with a friend of mine, that if satyA can’t go to kailAs’, then s’ivA will have to come here and visit me as a sheer helpless reward for my laziness.
Brown explains that “within everything wonderful, something sinister – or painful – can be hidden. Look at the olive under the water and you will see that it has a spear going through it.”
Take your piece of pork and, with the fat side up, rub liberally with cumin, kosher salt, and fresh cracked black pepper. Chef Novelli put 2 star anise on top, but I didn't have whole, so I sprinkled on anise seed. Don't use too much because it can be overpowering. Place on top of the roast 3 bay leaves, 5-6 sprigs of fresh thyme and 2 crushed cloves of garlic.
The book has lovely illustrations. The whole theme is going on adventure- becoming a mighty warrior. There are scenes of searching for treasure- as that is what we are doing- in a spiritual sense. My daughter actually calls it the "pirate book" because there are pictures of pirates and treasure, maps, parrots, ships, and oceans.
Not a big stretch for those of you that know her, this image reminds me of Emily- sassy, sweet and swimming:) Her birthday is coming up fast so I might actually be ahead of the curve! I opened the image in Photoshop Elements, re-sized it to fit the space I wanted, then printed it on my Epson 3800. I usually heat set the image for a few seconds to make sure it's really dry before coloring with my Copics so there's no bleed from the image outline.
then he slid off my lap to stand up, with an announcement. "i'm going to talk to jesus. over by the bathroom. my gramma says jesus isn't in the bathroom." a sad face.
I know it’s quite late, but I’ve just woken up from the new year’s haze. Things are slow at work, so I have my life back! Yay!
to placate blood enemies: power-seekers who would commit any crime,
stop-and-search
Gosh, more oatmeal. More oatmeal please!
Friday was that wonderful, glorious day I had set aside for all of us girls to be bums for the day. We watched an insane amount of Christmas movies and baked a lemon loaf and made two different kinds of fudge.
along the Chingale area. He said
Most younger artists, I have noticed, think that safety and health precautions are for wimps. They live in industrial neighborhoods, sand without a respirator, weld without protective clothing, and use the kind of paint thinner that, well, peels paint. Without gloves. I know, because I used to be one of these artists.
While Parker was napping this afternoon, Billy sent me to get a pedicure at my favorite place. He's too sweet!
“Holy shit,” Steve gasped. ““Son of a bitch, what are they?”
They should also deeply consider who will value their product and why, which gets to Thiel’s comment about pricing power. These are the only people who want it.
But what seems to be happening now is that football fans are de-humanising the opposition, their players and their fans. They cease to be Adrian from Accounts, they become that Manc B*stard. And after all they’re all the same, aren’t they? Those Manc b*stards.
To make it easy, I'm including the contact info again below.
I've had some time to cool down from my last post. I'll admit that I haven't cooled much. Derick asked me to remove her from FB so I did. I feel good about it. He was tired of seeing me so angry and so hurt. I wish I could get over this bitterness. I hate living my life like this. I just don't know how to do it. A friend suggested prayer. So I tried it. I'm also hoping to get back to journaling. You know, in a place that people don't read it. How did I get to be this person?
Tuscany
The positive thing for this movie is you come out asking a bunch of questions on a plethora of subjects. I think we might all see echoes of our own stumbling journeys: our insecurities, our hypocrisies, our pain. We might even feel a little convicted, but the movie only hints at answers. Which is good, because do we really have all the right answers? If the movie told me exactly what the answer was on these subjects I would have vomited right there on site.
Oils – See alternatives to Animal Fats and Oils.
My husband has had 4 back surgeries awaiting the 5th one
Thanks to you, I have spent entirely too much money this summer on all the cute new clothes that have hit my favorite Lilly store. Thankfully my husband found it humorous that I got a little carried away one night on a shopping spree with my mom and sister (who, ahem!, did not help me stick to my budget). Word of caution - do not have a dirty martini and then go shopping unless your husband is as understanding as mine.
1 Tbsp. Worstershire Sauce (again I use more)
Seconds later, she said, unlock your door. She stepped inside, shut the change room door, lifted her top and said, “Look, I wasn’t kidding!” We laughed together but she looked so stunning in the aqua halter-top she was trying on, I assured her no one would notice. I know this because they don’t seem to notice it with me either. But I do.
I think the new covers are absolutely gorgeous and will definitely appeal to UK YA fans, but for me personally there’s just something so striking and unique about the US and original UK covers that really made them stand out to me. I do however LOVE the burning leaves on Insurgent and I’m a sucker for a purple cover!
“Nothing lasts forever and Doctor Who has been phenomenally successful, but even if it were to drop a couple of million viewers, it would still be the pick of most TV dramas.”
Good night, ladies, good night, sweet ladies, good night, good night.
10. Bumpin' On Sunset
The inside of the card reads "it's your birthday".
Angle Vs Styles, now.
I am not sure what possessed me to purchase these boxes of processed sugar and memories of the many summer nights I spent in front of an episode of "Are You Afraid of the Dark" (hiding under a blanket of course).
I had to do a little research just to figure out how big the Drop of Fear is and what I found was that the Drop of Fear is 131 feet high. And my eight year old wanted to ride it.
I think it was July 7, 1969…they started beating me with a car fan belt. In first 2 days I took over 300 strokes…then stopped counting because I never thought I would live thru it.
So I don’t worry about dabbing on my make-up and choosing the right, colour coordinated purse before I leave. Instead I make sure my keys, wallet, lock and bungie cords are stashed away in my panniers.
2010.08.18 Iraq Diyala 3 0 Three brothers are brutally murdered on their own farm by Mujahideen.
The exterior of the building is, for the most part, in a sorry state but on the inside things are looking up. At the time of writing, four apartments are in the process of being refurbished and an elevator is being installed. This decision has been controversial though as accommodating the lift has meant removing metre-long sections of the staircase banister... which, over the course of its five flights, features a bas-relief retracing nothing less than the history of architecture from prehistoric dolmens to 19th-century housing!
I then start wonder about the children who commit suicide. Is it always depression or a psychological disorder what causes it? Or can it sometimes be a fad? I understand suicide is something that can be caused by more than just one factor. But is it something that now is SO talked about and in news and media, that children almost find it to be an option to their problems. It worries me that a child who originally would have never had the thought of suicide would now consider it an option.
But TI was also critical of some wealthy nations that registered significant drops in the global rankings, such as Britain, whose score fell to 7.7 points from 8.4 in 2007.
Of course she did! Because that's my girl... To which the teacher responded with, "That horse has ulcers and that's why it is underweight. Your mother shouldn't make assumptions like that without knowing the truth behind the the matters."
that I was the only one that I wanted to.
South Dakota
"That we're poor. That we're homeless."
Hi Girls, sorry for the absence, but I have had such a lot going on and haven't been able to find much time for the computer. I am hoping to catch up with you all over the weekend and can't wait to see what you have all been creating!! :))
Is how we should club the cop that cuffed you, steal his keys, and break you out
The sun burned relentlessly those first days. He survived the blast by the grace of the unholy, confined as he was. His hunger spiked.
Then we were led down the narrow hallway to the courtroom. I had a bit of deja vu as we walked, remembering that the last time I entered this very courtroom was a year ago, along with Emily’s birth-parents, to hear if her case would move toward adoption or not.
Beautiful eh?
Knoydart is a place that tends to grow around you, weaving its own magic. As always, we stood on the boat yesterday and looked back at the receding shore with a sense of privilege and pleasure at having experienced it.
--Kay Arthur
Keeping mum has been the standard police line on the Bersih 3.0 rally, which is a huge contrast to the Bersih 2.0 protest.
I was pleasantly full, but not over-stuffed...just right. For $8.48 with tax, I couldn't ask for a better lunch in such a lovely environment. The teen is hoping we will eat there again one night this week...we'll see...but there's a good chance!
Now for the exciting news . . .
With the start of a new academic year (and Max in Middle School!), September always feels like January's onset of a new calendar year. Off to a fresh new start: Supplies, Lunches and Activities are revised.
257. Leftover Wings & Cajun Fries w/ Pirate’s Gold Sauce @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 11:36 a.m.
Rowan turned to face James. His brown eyes were the colour of strong coffee and his lashes were thick and long for a man. But it was the softness in their depth and the way fine lines radiated from their corners when he smiled, which she noticed most.
"Some of them haven't been trained to respond to a structural fire.
God’s opulence is held in trust for those
I was thinking of my father. And my mother.
All that aside, when Mary and Qacei, proprietress's (is that a word???) of Sunny Side Up heard that I had miscarried (more on that later....maybe) they made me a ....
He finally overcame me and beat on my windows, cracking them. I drove faster and faster, but it didn’t help. I helplessly watched him shatter the windshield and my vision was distorted from the broken glass. The he did something I didn’t count on: he took his scythe and chopped my right front tire.
My body feels different. Weird. It's kind of like I don't have a "bloat" any more. Not that I was aware that I had bloat before. My back fat does not feel as fat anymore. My face feels smaller. I can tell there is less inner thigh to rub together when I walk.
Twitter Breached, 50K Accounts Posted to Internet – Twitter said Wednesday that it is continuing to investigate an apparent data breach that resulted in more than 50,000 user names and passwords being posted to the Internet.
Stu told me this story yesterday, but I got caught up in making a light box and going out for Banana Pineapple Margarita and chocolate nachos with some other mom’s, (YAY!), and then crashing that I didn’t write this up.
Vitamin D can be obtained in dairy products, egg yolks, fortified foods, and sunshine. Calcium can be obtained in dairy products, enriched tofu, seeds, nuts, legumes, dairy products, and dark green vegetables including broccoli, kale, spinach, and collard greens. Iron is found in raisins, figs, legumes, tofu, whole grains (particularly whole wheat), potatoes, and dark green leafy vegetables.
FLUscam.com is already broadcasting nearly two hours of submissions to be judged by a team of government whistleblowers and watchdogs supporting complementary and alternative healing organizations benefiting from the mass exodus of patients from medical methods of “disease control.”
“But it wouldn’t, would it?”
I found a beautiful prayer by Bhishma to Krishna as he lay on his bed of arrows from the Mahabharata. It is a wonderful thing to know how such a pure self approached the ultimate self for yoga. That is what Janamejaya asked Vaisampayana (Vyasa’s student), who was telling him the Mahabharata.
Clearly, Jolie Mason thinks of her iPhone not merely as a phone, but as a full computer, complete with e-mail and internet browsing. She expects the situation to improve dramatically as new talking applications continue to appear at a rapid rate. She believes that one day soon, major hotels, hospitals and airports will be fully mapped in an application similar to Fast Mall, enabling adventurous blind users such as herself to move about the indoor environment with dramatically increased freedom. If she is correct about even a few of these developments, blind and low vision users of the future will have some intriguing choices to make. The question may no longer be “to touch or not to touch?” but “which screen do I want to get my hands on–iPhone, or Android?” Whichever operating system prevails, it seems increasingly likely that–ready or not–those talking touchscreens will one day soon be a lot closer to many of us than they are right now.
Well, as I found out, there is no such outfit, so I just changed into a cardigan, tweed jacket and jeans and rubbed my way out of the building, pissed off, harried, flustered and late.
Eight trailer posts
“Ineffectively?”
How to keep your heart from breaking, when you cant talk to your flesh?? A child you have love carried in your body, wiped the snot from their face and the poop from their butt? I pray to GOD every night. Most of the time its just to make sure she is safe and happy, and I ask God to let her know I love her more then the moon and stars. Sometimes I ask God if I can just hear her little voice, then no lie I hear in my head “I love you mommy” and its like she is standing right there beside me. I smile for a moment, then I come back to the fact that she is not there. She is 600 miles away with a man that told her that she has a new mommy and that I am dead!
Gosh polishes were on sale recently - buy one get one free! I, of course, had to take advantage of the offer LOL. I realised I have so many Gosh polishes that I haven't even tried - most of them from previous sales. So, I decided to pull out a few and swatch!
It has been stated that the Agency Underwriting and Processing guidelines are going backward to some degree, toward the manual underwriting process, one small effort at a time and the rules and regulations are being made to ensure that an applicant can carry the increased debt they are about to embark upon. Fannie, Freddie, and FHA are all emphasizing that it is the lenders responsibility to verify anything that is questionable with regard to the mortgage applicant's application. Anything that might prevent the performance of a loan must be questioned and documented. They are being upfront with the fact that there are instances when there must be additional information verified to make certain loan applicants have the willingness, capability and capacity to pay back the mortgage loan.
$2/1 Olay Flu bookq
Questions for Anni’s friends and family:
I have read the books, so I understood some references that were not fully explained (the costumes of the capitol & the three finger salute), but I went with my housemate Zoe, who had not read the books and she understood the movie without any problems. In short – we loved it!
Working on a sheet.
See you in Boston Ryan!
As the eighth volume in the historical society’s series of Neighborhood and Architectural History Guides — each highlighting a different neighborhood of Brooklyn — this latest is the most ambitious to date, containing more original, nuanced research, as well as an ISBN number, making it “an actual book,” says Morrone, the book’s author. It’s available for purchase at Amazon and other places outside of the historical society’s building in Brooklyn Heights.
Black Slick Writer
170,000 words.
But probably the oddest object that sparked the idea for a little horror story I called Bad Dreams came from a drinks can. I was driving at night with my grandson, Jake. He'd finished his can of pop, crushed the can slightly then placed it on the dashboard. As I was driving, certain street lights brought its reflection up in my line of vision. The dents he’d made somehow transformed the image I was seeing from a tin can to a face - a macabre bodiless face that was white and haunting... A storyline was already forming in my head by the time we’d got home.
-I-
His eyes sparkle in joy,
Daniel and his friends were the “best and brightest” of the young men of Jerusalem. They were also royalty.
It’s a Favorite among many, whether it be just the picture or in card form.
The flour was sprinkled over the cooked onion, and cooked for a minute or two. Then, I added about 1 cup of the beef stock, and the Worcestershire sauce. On medium-high heat, the sauce began to thicken very nicely.
My everything
After nearly three and a half hours, the last of the guests trickled out, full of cheese, donated wine (courtesy of Vehrs Domestic and Imported Beverages) and interesting Grameen Foundation tidbits. If the success of this event is an indication of how the rest of our anniversary-event series will go, be sure not to miss the next one!
Arbitration and applicable law
Green roofs have many benefits, which are explained in the video by project leaders Loralyn Fabian and Katherine Camp:
MICHIELS B, PHILIPS H, COENEN S, DENEKENS J, VAN ROYEN PAUL. Serum antibodies against circulating influenza strains among vaccinated and unvaccinated general practitioners during two consecutive years (2002-2003). Vaccine 2006; 24: 3145-3152.
Publisher: Delacorte Books for Young Readers
(yes, we call ourselves a commune… its a long story)
Just having had the soccer world cup in South Africa last year, it’s an absolutely unique experience that you should have at least once. It doesn’t really matter which sport, but be there amongst the crowd in the stadium to witness one of the final games of the event in person. The vibe is totally amazing.
Last night my sister-in-law gave birth to a perfect little girl. I've yet to meet her, and she doesn't have a name yet- but I'm already feeling love.
4. Buyers want the savings Even for those who do search for FSBOs, most buyers automatically deduct 6 percent from the sales price because they want the savings in their pockets, not the seller’s. The result is that many FSBOs end up selling for up to 20 percent less on average as compared with sellers who hire a Realtor.
06011006
happy 6 years, babe. thank you for who you are. i love your energy and how you balance me out. you are smart, and funny, and charming, and creative. you make me laugh and you hold me when i cry. you are my other half. i'm going to miss you like crazy, but i am also so proud of you and i think you are pretty amazingly brave.
Because like I told someone the other day on Facebook: “I don’t think that even Stephen King could write 350,000 words.”)
Anyway, we’re going to bullet and quote the note by Stephane Deo, Justin Knight and Beat Siegenthaler.
Millay was a rebel in her time, and that makes her more relevant than ever to our time. A beautiful, independent, feisty, and bisexual woman, she refused to be tied down by the conventions of her day, and nowhere is this more evidenced than in her poetry. Millay really shines in her sonnets, where she uses a very traditional form to express very personal and immediate feelings in modern language. Two poems that you should not miss are “What Lips My Lips Have Kissed” and “I Being Born a Woman and Distressed”.
My new kangkung seedlings! One of the cats dug a hole and I guess you know why! It "poo-ed" and of course, the flies had a party! I sprayed with water-based aerosol and later, scoop it up to dispose of it, and guess what, little crawly maggots are underneath! Yucks! Yucks! Yucks! Sprayed again, and a few hours later, did the dirty job of disposing it off. Sprayed one more time, left the pot in the sun for two whole days, covered with some bamboo sticks, just in case the little cuties thought this is their private potty pot! Threw the kangkung away, that was one whole packet of seeds!
He said: “The BNP have tried to con the voters recently by wearing a suit and tie in the vain attempt of pretending they are ‘respectable, non-racist’ politicians.
Engineered by: Drummie
And according to the Quran Allah would never command his followers to take any prophet or angel as their Lords:
I see and understand
I called HD and told them to come get our old door and order us a new one. For some reason, they were a whole lot more accommodating with me than Chris.
once we got into rome we navigated our way to the vatican city, just a few blocks from the train station.
Good morning, lovelies! Happy Saturday to you! Any big plans this weekend? As you're reading this I am probably at my 12-hour crop at Archiver's. Woo hoo! Can you imagine all the creativity flowing? =D
Anyway, not much more to say about school and classes for now. I went to get my Domestic Residency Card yesterday, but that is a long and complicated story for next time.
But new hardwood floors kind of changed that. ;) I wasn’t set on it till the guys pulled up the carpet in the front room before the install. There was a HUGE water ring on the plywood, and I stood there for about five minutes trying to figure out what in the heck it was from.
So many sayings and old quotes tell you that you need to surround yourself with positive people. Perhaps it is not that I am a “psychic sponge” because I am a Pisces, but perhaps most people feel an intense pain when exposed to it. Of course I want to share that, perhaps it will make it easier on them. A retreat from the world does seem like a nice escape to regain some strength and sanity though. I think I will have to try that this weekend.
Pour into cake tin.
Anyway, I need to get back to work. Maybe next time I'll not fail at the Ihop run attempt. I seriously still want some pancakes. Here's a clip I found on the Tubes earlier today.
Hours: 16h36
(Note: The directory /vol/examples/tutorial/ is an area to which everyone in the school has read and copy access. If you are from outside the University, you can grab a copy of the file here. Use ‘File/Save As..’ from the menu bar to save it into your unixstuffdirectory.)
-Having your arm broken for attempting to adjust the air conditioning
“Like the sultan, the Young Turks and then the Kemalists continued to deny and rationalize the Armenian Genocide. They planned the genocide and implemented it as covertly as they could, and when they were confronted by the world, they resorted to blaming the victims and rationalizing the crime, and they did everything they could to promote forgetting.” (The Burning Tigris, Pg’s 373-374).
A few plans for the rest of the week... um, to spend a lot of time with my family, ha ha!
Shows on Roku are all on demand. We like that we can watch what we want to when we want too.
SO stoked for Wednesday! Not only do I get an overnight date with the husband, but we are going to the rodeo to see Blake Shelton & eat our weight in delicious BBQ!
cold medicine
If You Don't
Let's make some Taco Soup with Mojo Sauce, shall we?
So, without further ado I'll hand over to Jason...
About the company
Depression is an interruption in life, a breaking. I thought it would be possible to join the two ends together and carry on. But it’s not. Depression is a blunt instrument. It leaves the ends tattered and damaged. They don’t fit. But this is a good thing. An opportunity. It’s not about starting again where you left off, it’s about becoming a new self. One you can choose. You can make a decision, to be that which you most want to be. It’s an act of creation. We are our own ultimate work of art.
When you are building or editing your website always make sure it is user friendly. There is nothing more wasteful than having an online customer surf onto your website and they have no clue what the “call to action” is. They will leave fast and worse, with a bad impression about your company. For sake of not being mean, we won’t link to any website examples.
You experience a mixture of pain and anger. You manage to mutter, “Just tell him to hurry.”
In many ways, said Zehr, the current criminal justice system denies victims almost everything they need. He quoted Judy Herman saying that if you set out to design a system to create post traumatic stress for a victim, you couldn't do better than a court of law. This theme was repeated in other conference events so far - that the court process places unfair demands on victims that exacerbate their emotional response to crime instead of help them. Restorative justice models focus more on giving victims that opportunity to confront both their victimizer and and their own personal demons - to publicly have their say and "'re-story' what happened to them in a way that lets them regain honor." However those approaches have proven difficult to graft onto the traditional adversarial system, where there is no real avenue for victims to "reconcile differences" with offenders.
We will never say die ever!
You see, as an attachment parent, I have responded to her every need. Whether it was hunger, thirst, frustration, discomfort, whatever, I have always actly promptly. So promptly that in 9.5 months, I have only seen tears from my baby 2 or 3 times. Not because she isn't a crier you understand, because she has had ample desire to cry what with so much irritability. But because I have soothed her every time.
ENTIRE AISLE of ICE CREAM, they did NOT HAVE
Idea theft is something that many new writers fear. Indeed, I have had one writer say to me, "I'm not sending off my article in case the editor pinches my idea." Well that's fine, do what you want, but what was the point of writing the article in the first place if you're not going to send it off? If all writers kept their ideas to themselves, fearing the editor would steal their ideas, then nothing would be published!
3. Not making things
Even if he had never made a film, W.C. Fields would have been one of the most important men in show business history. He was a man of several careers: tramp juggler in vaudeville, a star in Broadway revues, a popular radio guest, and star of two separate film careers, both silent and talkie. He spent the last 50 years of his life in show business and almost all of them as a star. For the first twenty or so of those years he was best known as a juggler, and one of the best in the business.
While our data base system is much more complicated than any system with which I’ve ever worked, I do understand how it works. True, I spent about three years confused about how to do certain things; but our executive director and I spent three days a couple of months ago teaching me the in’s and out’s of the system. Now I know have a handle on what is needed and how to make the data base do what I need for it to do.
Olympians J.R. Celski, China’s Meng Wang and Sun Linlin , US Team member Kyle Uyehara and US Junior Team member Kendal Pumphrey.
And today it's all about the luuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuurve. :)
captain chaos...i did have a mask, but it wasn't enough!
On Saturday, there will be dozens of live music performances from bands like Florence + the Machine, A$AP Rocky, Atlas Sound, Company Flow, Four Tet and John Maus, to name a few. There will also be a slew of DJ sets, including the triumphant return of Justice, who will be playing their first NYC DJ set in two years, Juan MacLean, one of the most notorious artists on the DFA roster, as well as Nic Thorburn from the beloved indie-pop band Islands and the electronic duo The Golden Filter.
I were the only one.
4. If you look at the ground instead of looking up ahead, you’ll lose your balance and crash.
Big Eye ~ 2001/1994
Today the U.S. Department of Agriculture requires labels with the term ‘yam’ to be accompanied by the term ‘sweet potato’ so you will know what you are really buying. Unless you specifically search for yams, which are usually found in an international market, you are probably eating sweet potatoes!
No Thanks
Red. Frank and I saw this for date night last night. LOVED IT. It's billed as an action/adventure/comedy, and that's just about right. The lovely cast appears to be having a fine time through much of the filming (Helen Mirren gets to fire a big-ass machine gun while wearing an evening gown - it is SO clear why she took this role), and the jokes and gags fly as fast and furious as the bullets. Who cares if some of the plot devices are a bit tired? It's just a fun, fun, fun couple of hours. Worth seeing on the big screen.
***FTC Disclosure: This book was provided by the author in exchange for an honest review, no other compensation was given, all opinions are my own***
What have you accomplished this year, what are you harvesting, what are you putting down to grow anew?
Happy birthday to my dear mummy, to Her Majesty the Queen and to my capital city, Rome. Yes, I really mean the city of Rome.
Strange...
I got denied my unemployment.... as in cut off.... as in this in my only income right now. Now I was warned that might happen if I didn't go back to school, but for goodness sake, I'm going back to school. The thing is, they didn't approve my going back to school either. They apparently want me to get a job.
No shopping list or piece of paper is safe in our house these days. As Popps learns to write a new letter each week in the class room she is also changing her writing style and playing with the way her letters look. It is important to her to get the letters correct and to look like the teacher wants them to look and she practices on anything that doesn't move. And sometimes on things that do (it was only chalk, dogs don't mind having their names written on them).
A Different Kind of Christmas ... LMN ... 10 PM
10) I know you recently toured the US. How was it? Any chance to see you in Italy in the near future to get our copies signed?
Some characters in Noh theatre are identified by their masks. Those of the gods are fearsome and monstrous. Human masks are more subtle in their design. In full light, the masks appear to betray no emotion. Just a blank motionless stare. But they were crafted so that an actor can hold his head at different angles, and the lighting will portray a range of emotions – fear, anticipation, joy, sadness – depending on how the light reflects upon the masks. People here are like that too. Their expressions may not change, yet neither can they be concealed. They are revealed by the changes in the light.
The Confederate army had crossed the Potomac River into Maryland from Sept. 4 through 6, 1862, at White's Ford, a few miles below the Monocacy River, and had moved on to Frederick with cavalry fanning out to camp as close as Hyattstown. The invasion would be stopped at the Battle of Antietam on Sept. 17, but Gen. George McClellan, in command of the Union Army of the Potomac, did not know that at the time. Fearing the invading rebel army was intent on attacking the nation’s capitol, he immediately sent troops north to defend the major roads and bridges that the enemy might use.
‘Look where you’re going next time,’ he scowled.
Anthem for a Doomed Youth
They do aren’t the more customers’.
Everyone’s been impatiently expecting him but I was anxious. When he arrives, he will be under my full responsibility. I will be making decisions on his behalf. What if I make a wrong decision…! Oh God I can’t! And I can’t always be right! How did new moms handle their first babies? Millions of moms have been there before and millions coming after me. Yet experience is incomparable to any documented or told stories. All I can do is wait!
How the Dow Jones internship helped her career: “Ask me this question again in a few months, and I can tell you if working for The New York Times actually helped me get a job. Right now, though, it’s made me a better journalist in several ways. I was able to read a wide variety of stories at my internship because I worked for the Metro desk. During a typical week, I’d handle a couple of stories about crime in the city, a political story about a new tax the mayor wanted to pass, an obituary of a well-known New Yorker and a few longer feature-style pieces for the Sunday Metropolitan section. Reading so many different — but all well-written — pieces improved my own writing. But the most beneficial part of working at the Times is that you’re working with the very best, all of whom are eager to help you. My coworkers took time to show me what I was doing wrong and tell me how to fix it. I got suggestions on where to apply after graduation, and I left the paper with a long list of people who were willing to serve as references. Connections like that are invaluable.”
I know what you're thinking: When the hell are we finally going to get a Chinese Kung Fu Steampunk movie?
I am at my sister’s now. Her and her husband have gone away on a two day retreat compliments of my brother-in-law’s parents. It’s really nice of them, they’ve not only paid for them to go and stay in a hotel and rent a car to travel to the north of the country, they have also taken their two babies to babysit for the two days. An 8 week old and a year and a half year old! Good luck to them!
"Why NOT?" she protested, as if to convince me that I should go back and do it.
The flowers were stamped onto Rustic White cardstock using Wisteria Wonder ink and then cut out. I adhered them to my card with foam dimensional tape and then nestled the sentiment in that space under the stems. I distressed the top and bottom edges of the panel and then adhered it to a Wisteria Wonder card base. The finishing touch was a bit of Dazzling Diamonds glitter along the blooms.
The little boys continued to play on the race track, and I designed for a while. Tom read his book for a while, and Eme.... well, I'm not sure what she was doing.
Vishal Dadlani: Aamir coulda made 3 Cr. a day for any kinda TV show. He CHOSE to make his airtime worthwhile. May his tribe increase. #satyamevajayate.
Taking expeditious advantage of its new exclusive agreement with USA Baseball, Panini America officials worked behind the scenes with USA Baseball executives to acquire several game-worn jerseys to rush into Limited, which officially went live today. The result? Scarce, massively-majestic memorabilia cards, rare Letter Winners nameplate letter 1/1s and even a base insert set numbered to 199.
1. Preheat oven to 450 degrees F (230 degrees C). Butter and flour four 4 ounce ramekins or custard cups.
If you are reading this, please know: I love you.
6. Threshold into the Unknown
Like other titles in the Kindle Kids Library from Xist Publishing, DOCTOR has been formatted to take advantage of the Kindle, Kindle Fire and Kindle apps for phones, tablets and computers. The photos look crisp and clear on color and black and white devices.
Hello friends! Happy Thursday to you all! I hope everyone is well...even on this wet and gloomy day here in Montreal...
In real world scenarios, the One S should surely stick with you all day.
—- Michael Jackson “Great Beer Guide”
Here's my take on it. It's in the local Northants dialect, now sadly dissappearing into Estuary English.
The idea to challenge academia from within, when it comes to antisemitism, will be among the life achievements of Charles Small.
How this plays into group projects is some people have a hard time being honest about people’s work to their face. Fear of immediate reproach or offending that person reigns in honest critiques. The need to be polite overshadows the desire to be “mean” or constructive. For a group project to be successful, the members have to be comfortable enough to voice concerns about the other members’ work. Because if one student finds something wrong with another student’s work, but refrains from speaking out about it, that mistake might never get corrected. This timid dynamic is not useful and is often taxing to those who actually want help.
“No, I noticed. I noticed,” I said. “Maybe he’s a DJ?”
Let's see what we've got: Green-eyed redhead holding a drink (the most enduring symbol of Ireland, as we all know). Tam o' Shanter-style hat and matching scarf (in case of inclement weather inside the pub), and a nice splash of tartan to drive the point home. As with many of the ladies pictured in this book, blazing red nail polish is the order of the day, and in case we still weren't quite clear on the Irish connection, our lovely model is standing in front of a green backdrop. The expression of fright/surprise is a nice touch, as are the very visible fillings in her teeth. If it weren't for the relatively restrained use of makeup, I'd say the shot comes off as a fine portrait of prescription medication abuse.
Lord, I have much to learn and even more to discover about Your plans for my life.
Last year I set out to get a certain specific percentage of my business income from wholesale selling and increase sales by X dollars.
Memory 3: Nature
Dec 3rd – REALLY expected to break down when I saw Maria and her Mom but I stood there in utter shock because they are almost unrecognizable! They are soooo chunky!
December 31
GET READY TO POP THOSE ANTACIDS BABY!!!!!!!
MEETING POINT: Calle 8. Exact address disclosed with ticket purchase.
I texted Jen to see what she did, and she was kinda like me, not wanting to spend boo-coo's, and she told me to go to Wal-Mart. So, Wally World, here I come! She told me she just went up in sizes till they fit her comfortably.
1/2 cinnamon
In the beauty blogosphere, there's a phenomenon called Project Ten Pan, in which a beauty junkie refuses to buy any more cosmetics until she "hits pan" on ten items languishing in her collection.
Anyway, she'd been instructed not to let us leave until Lloyd could get home from work. I would have liked to try to see her stop us from leaving. Like I was going to acquiesce to Lloyd's demands, when it was his fault they had to cancel, because he was having a conniption fit over a car repair. He showed up right after that, and we stayed long enough for MJ to open his "gifts". Which included a small Star Wars themed lunch box with a package of Combos in it, and a small tin bucket with some nasty orange slice candy (and 2 or 3 Reese's cups that came from a larger bag) and a smiley faced sucker. By the time we got back in the truck, I was ready to piss my pants from laughter.
I have attended protests and marches where the “compassionate” message gets lost in angry and accusatory voices. I enjoy speaking up for animals but I honestly do not like some of the behavior that seems to only close the ears of those we want to listen and perpetuates the myth that Vegans are angry people-haters. I pick and choose which events I attend more carefully now and try to engage people with smiles so they might be more inclined to listen.
No. Appearing:
Brien Jones keeps saying I shook him down or blackmailed him into printing books for 30 people for free. How could I have “ordered” Brien Jones to do anything? What kind of power did I have to “blackmail” him? He asked me in May of 2007 if he could take my book Straight Wives: Shattered Lives and republish it for free and leave Airleaf. I accepted his offer as did some of his other friends and disillusioned Airleaf authors whom he republished. In return, I allowed him to showcase me in his Author Celebrities and other bogus sites for 3 months until I asked him to stop publishing my books because I went with a different publisher whom I preferred to pay for publishing services because I saw the handwriting on the wall, and I didn’t want to be associated with it. I did ask him to do a good deed and republish the book of a young dying man who had been scammed by Airleaf for eight thousand dollars. I told him it would be good karma to do something to show he was trying to help authors. Short of that, anyone printed for free was his way of stealing Airleaf authors to start his own business. I have no doubt that he published some of his friends’ books for free because I know who they are. But they were his friends—not mine. The one friend I referred to Jones Harvest in June of 2007 paid for her publishing services like everyone else.
Then it occured to me that you don't know what a pink slip is. In fact, in this modern age, does anyone under age 25 even know what a pink slip is?
And now, we're talking about making a trip to Texas here soon. Hopefully this time we can hit up everyone... who knows, right?
Important: Please read these Official Rules before entering this online promotion (the "Promotion").
WOW! How cool is that?!
Finally they went away…and I went to bed #oldlady
Before I even get into this, I want to preface my post with this: My desire in posting about Joel Osteen’s theology and poor display of the Gospel of Jesus Christ is not to defame or slander him as a person, but instead with the hope that Jesus would be glorified by the truth of His character and person being made clear, distinguished from what Joel incorrectly preaches about God, and that Joel would himself understand the truth of the character of God and repent of his poor stewardship of his role as pastor/teacher, and love Jesus rightly for who the Bible says He is. Secondly, I am speaking only about Joel Osteen and not his church in any way. I would not want to divide the church by speaking against people who may truly love Jesus for who He really is, despite sitting under inaccurate teaching.
since it’s a special holiday, here are a few mangas/animes that have a few asian new year scenes or episodes:
